Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
Number of Reviews
51

Author
Stephen Graham Jones
In Speilberg's Always, the dead hang around for awhile, tying up the loose
ends of their lives. In Jacob's Ladder, the dead hang around in a similar
manner, having to make peace before they can move on. Ditto with
Beetlejuice, High Plains Drifter, Ghost, etc. It's all about preparation. In
that regard the The Sixth Sense is no different. There's even a brilliant
little thematic moment where a red balloon is released in a staircase. It
climbs, climbs, rising steadily away from the party, and then finally comes
to rest against the ceiling, unable to go any higher. Yet. It's no accident
either that director/writer M. Night Shyamalan has the young Cole (Haley
Joel Osment) be the only one aware of this balloon. He can, after all, see
the dead, who are similarly trapped.
But of course he doesn't tell people this. Until child psychologist Malcolm
(pay-attention-to-the-name) Crowe (Bruce Willis) enters his life. The deal
with Crowe is that he feels he once failed to reach a similarly tortured
patient, and his failure led to the tragedy which the movie opens with: that
former patient breaking into Crowe's home for some impromptu therapy. The
Sixth Sense is set a year after that tragic session, but Crowe is hardly
over it. During that year of ostensible convalescence--both psychological
and physical--his marriage has fallen quietly apart, to the point where he
and his wife no longer talk. If he can only help this Cole, maybe everything
will be all right again.
So for Crowe, it's about redemption.
For Cole, however, it's about making it down the hall to the bathroom at
night, an acute terror we feel with him, although at that point there's yet
to be anything supernatural on-screen. But when it comes, hold on. Remember
about 45 minutes into Exorcist III, where an unannounced nun with some
cadaver tool floats silently across the hall, in the background? One of the
single scariest moments in moviedom, for the simple reason that, 45 minutes
into it, the tension level is so high that the slightest thing can release
it all at once. M. Night Shyamalan understands this thoroughly, and handles
his 'manifestations' with a steady hand. He never crowds a room with them,
but chooses instead to simply reflect them in a child's reaction shots. It's
not so much that they're out of the frame, though, as with The Blair Witch
Project. It's that they're locked into Cole's point-of-view, thus
inaccessible, or, only accessible when dramatically effective, which drains
a little off the illusion of reality any horror film depends upon. In
Shyamalan's defense, though, perhaps he delayed putting Cole's 'sixth sense'
on-screen simply because he wants us to know the viewer before the viewed.
Otherwise Cole might get upstaged.
All minor issues aside though, what stands out is how Shyamalan leads us to
believe that the dramatic line is lifted directly from Good Will Hunting:
the therapist and the patient both depending on each other for a cure. And
in a sense this is the dramatic line, but in the final moments, in what's
already looking like a typical Hollywood epilogue, it's recast in an
unconventional light. One that makes you reconcieve the whole movie, much as
Arlington Road did. Much as Jacob's Ladder did. The real surprise, though,
is that The Sixth Sense owes more to Always than to Jacob's Ladder. The
dual-epiphanies Cole and Crowe eventually achieve--tying together subplots
which seemed incidental but were in fact pivotal--make you appreciate the
darkened theater. People can't see your eyes without lights. But then
they're misty too: The Sixth Sense is a horror movie with an unexpected love
story embedded in it. Prepare.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Author
Bob Bloom

"The Sixth Sense" (1999) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Bruce Willis, Haley
Joel Osment and Toni Collette. Written and directed by M. Night Shyamalan.
 Some movies require patience and a modicum of faith from the viewer.
You can sit for an hour or more asking yourself, "Where is this movie
going?" or "When is something going to happen?"
 Then the last reel unspools, a light goes off in your head and, like a
jigsaw puzzle, everything comes together.
 That is how you should approach "The Sixth Sense." This supernatural
thriller requires careful attention. If you pick up on the nuances, then
you will find this a most satisfying feature. If you're the type that needs
to be walloped over the head with a sledgehammer, then I suggest you go see
"Deep Blue Sea" or "Brokedown Palace."
 "The Sixth Sense" is a chiller for serious moviegoers, those who pay close
attention to everything that happens on screen.
 Writer-director M. Night Shyamalan, with the aid of cinematographer Tak
Fujimoto, creates an aura of uneasiness. The movie has an almost surreal
quality to it. You know something is not quite right, but you can't put
your finger on what it is until the denouncement.
 An eerie score by John Newton Howard helps to heighten the suspense.
Actually, "The Sixth Sense" is a movie in which - dramatically - not much
really happens, yet paradoxically, events are transpiring constantly.
 Bruce Willis plays renowned child psychologist Dr. Malcolm Crowe who comes
to the aid of Cole Sear (Haley Joel Osment). The boy harbors a dark secret,
he is continually visited by ghosts. Everywhere he looks, he sees them.
 At 8, Cole is too frightened and confused by his paranormal gift to
understand its meaning.
 Cole and Crowe work together to uncover the truth and explain the
unexplainable. For Crowe, saving Cole would be redemption because of his
guilt for not being able to help an earlier patient.
 Shyamalan elicits a complex and tortured performance from young Osment.
The young man deserves a supporting actor Oscar nod for his portrayal of a
little boy overwhelmed by circumstances he can't even comprehend.
 Willis is low-key, speaking in mostly whispers as the anguished Dr. Crowe,
who is trying - by helping Cole - to put his life back together.
 Toni Collette, who made quite an impression a few years ago in "Muriel's
Wedding," is  confused and vulnerable as Cole's mother. She tries to be
supportive and loving, while being totally mystified by what is troubling
her son.
 "The Sixth Sense" is like a slow carriage ride around the park. You have
the time to take in all the sights, sounds and smells.
 It, along with "The Blair Witch Project," emphasize that you don't need
bloody special effects to create an atmosphere of horror or terror. As
always, the mind is the biggest bogeyman of all.
 So, savor "The Sixth Sense," like a fine glass of expensive wine. It is a
movie that demands you attention and will earn your respect.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Author
Brandon Herring
Rating: * * * * out of * * * *  
Starring: Bruce Willis, Haley Joel Osment, Olivia Williams, Toni Collete.
Rated PG-13 for intense thematic elements and violent images.
Not one movie I have seen in my life, has made me feel the way I felt when I
saw the newest classic 'The Sixth Sense'. A strikingly original movie that at
first glance seems like a horror film with many chills, turns into a
unexpectedly movie drama with a surprising ending. The acting in the film was
incredible especially by young Osment who gives one of the best performances of
the year. Bruce Willis is perfectly cast, as well as Toni Collete and Olivia
Williams. 
Haley Joel Osment plays Cole a young, smart boy plagued by images of dead
people still walking around. No one knows his secret but him, and he is
destined not to tell anyone. When child psychiatrist Malcolm (Bruce Willis)
finds out about the boy, he wants to help him. Naturally Cole is afraid and
scared to tell anyone even his mother played by Toni Collete. He and Malcolm
become good friends and Cole finally tells him about his 'sixth sense' and
seeing dead people. Although Malcolm's personal life with his wife becomes on
the rocks, he still tries to help the young boy and see what the illness is. At
first he doesn't believe him and thinks Cole is having visual hallucinations,
but after he thinks about what happened a year before he starts to believe Cole
leading to an ending that's not only shocking but very moving.
A different movie experience all together. With disturbing images of ghosts
walking around and terrorizing young Cole, it is extremely scary sometimes, but
most of the time it's a psychological drama that stems from the acting it has
in it, and the direction it was made with. Haley Joel Osment is excellent as
the young boy, and deserves all the credit he can get in this role that should
make him famous. His images of ghosts are not only believable but will give you
a new outlook on what ghosts are and what they are doing here. Bruce Willis
gives one of his most endearing and believable performances to date, who with
Osment make a great on-screen duo.
Toni Collete as Cole's mother gives a wonderful female performance and deserves
as well all the credit she can get. Olivia Williams who was so good in
'Rushmore' also gives a great performance. Being written and directed by M.
Night Shyamalan, this is a pure work of genius, nothing more nothing less. A
movie like this deserves to be nominated for a Best Picture Oscar as well as
Screenplay and acting. 
When you see this one, be sure to listen and understand it completely. It's not
a horror movie it's a sad, drama really with some scary parts. It means alot to
some people, it got down somewhere in me that no other movie before has. To put
it another way 'The Sixth Sense' is one of the best movie of this year.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring September 16, 1999.
Brandon Herring
Movie Review Heaven
(http://www.geocities.com/hollywood/movie/3160/moviereviewheaven.html

Author
Akiva Gottlieb
"The Sixth Sense", the new film from M. Night Shyamalan ("Wide
Awake"), explores themes of death and the afterlife in the form of a
psychological thriller. While the subject matter makes the film seem
more existential that the usual big-budget fare, its entire depth is
summed up in the film's signature line: "I see dead people".
Bruce Willis plays Malcolm Crowe, a child psychologist who is more
devoted to his work than to his wife (Olivia Williams). One night,
Malcolm is shot by a psychotic former patient (Donnie Wahlberg), but
three months later, he is back on the job.
His next mission is trying to help a troubled 9-year-old boy named
Cole (Haley Joel Osment), who lives alone with his single mother (Toni
Collette). The mother can't pinpoint exactly what's wrong with the
child, but Malcolm makes it his priority, and spends all his time
working on him. However, it takes half the film for Cole to admit that
he can see dead people, who want to use him as their messenger.
Malcolm believes that Cole is suffering from paranoid schizophrenia,
but through a series of bizarre twists, he begins to understand that
Cole is not hallucinating. However, when "The Sixth Sense" is over,
Cole has still not conquered his inner demons, and Shyamalan's
"brilliant" final twist feels like he's trying to shy away from the
fact that he has not resolved the film's major conflict.
Combine that with a not-so-great script and a slow, dragging pace and
you have an unsatisfying thriller. However, there are more than a few
gripping moments in the film, and the dark tone is set perfectly by
James Newton Howard's chilling score.
But what really saves "The Sixth Sense" is excellent acting,
especially by Toniy Collette and child prodigy Haley Joel
Osment. Anyone who has seen the preview knows that Osment steals the
show from Bruce Willis, and in the film, he proves that child actors
deserve better roles, for infact, they do have talent. M. Night
Shyamalan (who appears in the film)'s movie has struck quite a chord
with summer audiences, and he proves that one day he might make a fine
film. "The Sixth Sense", however, is not quite it.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Author
Fontaine Lien
Well don't I feel like a dumb butt now.  Back then when "The Sixth
Sense" trailers started appearing in theaters, I was skeptical.  It
looked like just another "Mercury Rising," and clips of Bruce Willis
staring off into space and that oh so skillful delivery of "I see dead
people" by Haley Joel Osmont (wonder boy of the year) really turned me
off to the movie.  Then whaddya know, it became a hit, and everyone
started talking about it; yet I stubbornly refused to see it.  Well sue
me for being suspicious about a Bruce Willis flick.  Thus is the saga of
how one afternoon I asked my friend to just tell me what the ending was
that everyone was so excited over.
I didn't know that I would have decided to see it one year later at a
school event.  And let me tell ya, I really wish I hadn't found out
about the surprise ending before I saw the movie.  I probably would have
enjoyed it a lot more.  That's not to say I didn't find "Sense" a
refreshing counterpoint to slasher flicks like "Scream 3," which I
enjoyed equally as much for a different reason.  If I had to pick one
word to describe "Sixth Sense" it would be "intense." The film exudes
quiet intensity for all of its, what, 110 minutes?  From beginning to
end, never a moment that wasn't unsettling.  I credit this to the set
designers and lighting people, who arranged the setting so that it
almost seems painted with a tangible, morbid gray; yet like some hideous
creature that hides in the light, we are unable to point out what
exactly about the sunny streets of Philadelphia is frightening us and
filling us with dread.  All this is nice complimented by the score by
James Newton Howard, who seems to have been taking quite a few notes
from Mark Snow.  The camera sulks stealthily from situation to
situation; and with the aid of fade ins and outs we feel like we're
watching the fragments of Malcolm's (Bruce Willis) life torn asunder. 
The effect is an eery film that quietly creeps up on you unlike other
horror films; yet it is different from "The Blair Witch Project" in that
it *does* show us the ghosts, sometimes with maybe too much flair on the
part of the director.  That we could have done without.  Otherwise the
film manages to spook us out without grossing us out too much; some
great moments include Cole (Osmont) banging on the attic door at a
friend's party and the video tape viewing at the funeral service. 
Moments like these
manage to send shivers down our spine without using too much blood and
gore.  I give points for that.  
Aside from Bruce Willis, who was probably chosen for his star power
rather than
suitability to the role, the few characters in this film were all
wonderfully cast.  Olivia Williams is sympathetic as the pale, sorrowful
widow (she seems born to play the pale sorrowful widow), and Toni
Collette is subtle as a young woman, seemingly barely in her twenties,
who doesn't seem to quite know how to handle motherhood, two jobs, and
the loss of a parent at the same time.  And Haley, Haley, Haley.  I'm
sorry for underestimating you.  Turns out you might give Jonathan
Lipnicki a run for his money.  As a child who is naturally adorable (and
you can see that sometimes, during the rare instances when Cole smiles
in the film), you gotta give the kid credit
for walking around convincingly frightened and stubborn throughout the
majority of the movie. When he delivers his lines, you want to inch
closer to the screen to hear the child speak.  When he is cowering in
fear, we feel part of ourselves huddle along with him in fear of
something WE ourselves fear the most.  Whatever it is must be dreadful. 
He is so frail that if you reach out you are afraid that you're going to
break him.  Yet when he speaks, you listen.  That's how good Haley was. 
And no, not even Bruce Willis was half bad.
Now "Sense" left a lot of things unexplained, such as just why the
ghosts do not realize they're dead (I mean, heck, what do they EAT?  And
don't they notice that everyone's ignoring them?), why didn't Anna
(Olivia Williams) just dial 911 for God's sake, how one little kid is
supposed to serve as the principal complaint bureau for the entire
underworld population, how DUMB can a doctor in child's psychology be in
not figuring out why his wife is depressed, and why aren't there any
evil ghosts?  However I am willing to give the film some leeway because
in not striving to give everything a LOGICAL explanation, it gives
everything an EMOTIONAL explanation.  That's why we believe that when
Cole gives his mother the message from Grandma,
we believe everything's going to be okay.   We believe that when Malcolm
finally realizes the truth about his existence, everything's going to be
okay.  I loved how even though the film was hawked as something that
would scare the poop out of people by showcasing the supernatural, it
snuck in jabs at humanity as well.  Even barely-there characters such as
the befuddled, agitated school teacher, the nonchalant parents of the
other children, Anna's young, inexperienced suitor, and the deceiving
(step?)mother at the funeral register in our minds as painfully
realistic reflections of everyday walks of life.  They were supposed to
make us scream, but they made us cry instead.
We were fooled.  Up until eighty percent of the movie, we thought we
were watching a
thriller/horror flick; with the last ten or fifteen minutes or so the
film does a sudden turn around and points out to us the theme that was
there along: humanity.  Sometimes ugly, but mostly marvelous (this time,
anyway) humanity.  We survived the transition from horror to drama, and
we're okay. The whole thing was strangely cathartic.

Author
Susan Granger
http://www.speakers-podium.com/susangranger.
Susan Granger's review of "THE SIXTH SENSE" (Touchstone Pictures)
 It's very important that you be in your seat for the
beginning of this psychological thriller and stay all the way through
to the end to comprehend the nuances of the twisting plot. Bruce
Willis plays a renown child psychologist who is emotionally torn
between spending time with his lovely wife (Olivia Williams) and
helping desperately needy eight year-old named Cole (Haley Joel
Osment), who is haunted by dark visions that terrify him. He sees dead
people, restless spirits. These eerie ghosts appear everywhere - at
home, at school, on the street - and they reach out, trying to
communicate. Often they actually wound him. Cole lives with his
stressed-out single mother (Toni Collette), who is empathetic, but he
is terrified to tell her his secret, to reveal his unexplainable
paranormal powers. Then Willis comes on the scene. Slowly, the young
boy opens up to him. A trust develops, as the psychologist wrestles
with how the fragile child can cope with the harrowing, unresolved
problems that surround him. Philadelphia-based, 28 year-old
writer/director M. Night Shyamalan ("Wide Awake") and cinematographer
Tak Fujimoto ("The Silence of the Lambs") create an intriguing,
elliptical visual style, building a melancholy aura of suspense and
creating a tense, slowly building menace. Combining his spiritual and
mystical Indian roots with his American upbringing, Shyamalan achieves
a subdued, provocative balance between what's real and what's
imagined.  Bruce Willis drives the story with a strong, poignant
performance but it's Haley Joel Osment whose talent is an
amazement. On the Granger Movie Gauge of 1 to 10, "The Sixth Sense" is
an ominous, unsettling, subtle 9. Only after the film's chilling
conclusion will you be able to fit the pieces of this ingenious
supernatural puzzle together.

Author
Christian Pyle
The Sixth Sense
Written and Directed by M. Night Shyamalan
Starring Bruce Willis, Haley Joel Osment, Toni Collette, Olivia Williams
Official Site:  http://movies.go.com/sixthsense/index.html
Grade: A-
When I saw the trailer for "The Sixth Sense," I didn't expect much from it.  My
snap judgment was that it was a watered-down version of "The Shining" or
possibly a late-entry in the glut of angel-related movies/TV shows of a couple
years ago.  But all the buzz motivated me to give it a shot.  It turned out to
be one of the most satisfying movie experiences of the year.
Bruce Willis plays child psychologist Malcolm Crowe.  At the beginning of the
movie, he is admiring an award the city has given him for his work, but he is
soon confronted by Vincent, a patient Malcolm failed years earlier (Donnie
Wahlberg-former New Kid-in an impressive cameo).  A year passes, and Malcolm is
treating another child with the same symptoms Vincent displayed.  Cole Sear
(Haley Joel Osment) is a withdrawn kid who is called "Freak" by the other boys
in the neighborhood.  Weird things seem to happen around Cole-his mother
(Olivia Williams) leaves the kitchen for a moment and returns to find every
cabinet and drawer open even though Cole hasn't moved-and Cole seems to know
things that a kid his age shouldn't-for example, that there was once a gallows
in his school.  He steals religious icons from churches to build a chapel in a
pup tent in his bedroom.
The trailer gave away the movie's first major plot twist.  If it hadn't, the
first hour of the movie would be more engrossing because we wouldn't know
what's wrong with Cole.  If you're lucky enough to have not seen the trailer,
stop reading this review right now and go see "The Sixth Sense."
Anyway, since the trailer gave it away, I figure it's fair game to discuss
here.  Once Malcolm gains Cole's trust, Cole reveals his secret:  he sees
ghosts everywhere.  Dead people wander around not knowing that they're dead,
invisible to everyone except Cole.  Malcolm gradually begins to realize that
Cole is telling the truth.
The box office success of "The Sixth Sense" has generated a lot of press about
how horror movies rule the box office this year and lots of theories about why
that's so.  I hate to burst anybody's bubble, but "The Sixth Sense" isn't
really a horror film.  At its core, "The Sixth Sense" is a touching story of
how a troubled kid and an emotionally-scarred adult help each other to move
past their problems.  Some scenes with the ghosts are wonderfully creepy,
though.  One that really got to me:  the ghost of a boy says to Cole, "I'll
show you where my dad keeps his gun"; when the ghost turns, we see the bullet
wound in the back of his head.
Osment gives the best performance I've ever seen from a child actor.  It's hard
enough to find a grown-up in Hollywood who can give a subtle, realistic
portrayal!  Although Willis gets top billing, Cole is really the protagonist of
the story, and Osment truly brings the complex kid to life.  If only Willis'
work were as impressive.  Accustomed to delivering catchphrases rather than
dialogue, Willis is stiff and awkward as Malcolm, his most challenging role to
date.  (This is a bad omen for his next movie, "The Story of Us," which
chronicles the ups and downs of a marriage).
Writer/Director M. Night Shyamalan has a light, poetic touch that goes to the
heart of the viewer without seeming sappy or trite.  He's also a skillful
storyteller, as the movie's ending demonstrates.  Only when the final secret is
revealed do you realize that Shyamalan has been hinting at it throughout the
movie.  Look for a cameo by the director as a doctor who treats Cole.
Bottom line:  Osment should get an Oscar nomination, and you should go see this
movie.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Author
Murali Krishnan
The use of spirits and ghosts in stories has existed in ancient
folklore and continues in modern literature. It is a topic that is
inherently interesting to some people, and automatically
disinteresting to others. The stories involving non-material spirits
often presume their actual existence, which turns off those who do not
believe in them. When they are used for horror effect, which is one of
their most common uses, it creates an uninteresting experience for
non-believers.
This film is a rare instance of a ghost story which is engaging even
for viewers who do not believe in the existence of ghosts. The story
centers around the relationship between two primary characters,
Malcolm Crowe (Bruce Willis) and Cole Sear (Haley Joel Osment).
Malcolm is an expert child psychiatrist who is haunted by a past
incident when a disturbed ex-patient shot him. The young man was upset
that Malcolm was not able to solve his problems so he attacked the
doctor, and Malcolm feels guilty at not being able to help the
desperate man. After some time, he eventually decides to take on the
case of Cole, a child who shows similar symptoms to his assailant.
Malcolm feels that his will give him a chance to redeem his
shortcomings that lead to his assault.
Cole claims to see the ghosts of dead people. His single mother, Lynn
Sear (Toni Collette), has previously taken him to doctors who could
not help him. She struggles to help Cole lead a normal life, but the
meek boy is harassed mercilessly by schoolmates because of his
peculiarities. Cole is initially wary of Malcolm, but Malcolm gently
works to win Cole's trust.
The film is successful for two reasons. First, it is a simple and
cleverly crafted story. Second, its use of spirits is ancillary. This
is foremost a story about the relationship between Malcolm and Cole.
If that aspect had not been adequately developed, the film could not
have been successful. Although the use of ghosts may appear to be a
gimmick, it must be noted that the story also contains other
dimensions that are carefully and successfully constructed.
Good performances are given by both Willis and Osment, but the prime
credit for the film's success should be given to M. Night Shyamalan,
who both wrote and directed it. The strength of the film is the story,
and the direction skillfully executes it. The main complaint may be
that the languid narrative becomes slow at times, and it even drags
before the climax.
Highly recommended. This film is the rare case of a ghost story that
has appeal to viewers who generally dislike that genre. It is anchored
by a strong story and is supported by capable directing and good
acting.

Author
Greg King
THE SIXTH SENSE (M).  
(Hollywood Pictures/Buena Vista International)
Director: M Night Shyamalan
Stars: Bruce Willis, Toni Collette, Haley Joel Osment, Olivia Williams, 
Trevor Morgan, Donnie Wahlberg, Mischa Barton
Running time: 107 minutes.
The Sixth Sense is a gripping and intriguing combination of
psychological thriller and ghost story, with a solid emotional core
that reminds one of Jerry Zucker's Ghost (1990).
Eight year old Cole Sear (beautifully played by Haley Joel
Osment, a veteran of television and film, whose roles include playing
Forrest jr in Forrest Gump) is a deeply troubled kid.  However, his
mother (Aussie actress Toni Collette) and doctors are unable to
discover the cause of his problems.  Enter renowned child psychologist
Dr Malcolm Crowe (Bruce Willis), who builds a rapport with Cole, and
eventually discovers that the kid is visited by ghosts.  Cole is
unusually sensitive to their presence, and these spirits want him to
help pass messages to their living relatives and ease their grief and
suffering.
A year earlier Crowe was shot by one of his former patients,
and is determined not to fail Cole, even at the cost of his failing
marriage.  His long suffering wife Anna (Olivia Williams, from
Rushmore, etc) has grown cold and distant.  In helping Cole come to
terms with his supernatural visitors, Crowe also understands the
source of his own personal problems.
Writer/director M Night Shyamalan ends the film with an
unexpected but rewarding twist.  So many films end with a twist that
is both contrived and unconvincing.  However, the sting in the tail
here works beautifully, and, like the surprise ending of The Usual
Suspects, it will have audiences re- evaluating everything from a
completely different perspective.
The Sixth Sense is in many ways an atypical Willis thriller.
Here he is not saving the world, merely a young child.  However, in
contrast to the recent Mercury Rising, he does it without blazing
guns.  Willis rises to the occasion with a far more perceptive,
restrained and intelligent performance that perfectly suits the mood
of the film.  However, it is young Osment who steals the film with his
sensitive, sympathetic, intelligent and hugely endearing portrayal.
Collette is superb as Cole's concerned but confused mother, and
delivers a solid, rich and gut-wrenching performance that easily ranks
amongst her best.
It seems fitting that The Sixth Sense is filmed in
Philadelphia, a city steeped in history and the ghosts of the past.
Shyamalan beautifully builds up an unsettling atmosphere with lots of
symbolism and mysticism.  He succeeds in unnerving audiences without a
heavy dependence on clever effects or carefully staged shocks.  Tak
Fujimoto's cinematography further enhances the film's eerie mood.
          This intriguing psychological thriller is actually the third
film from Shyamalan, a Philadelphia-based film maker who turned his
back on his family tradition of a career in medicine to pursue a film
career.  While his previous films are virtually unknown outside
America, The Sixth Sense has gained international release.  Shyamalan
directs with the assurance and confidence of a film maker in complete
command of his material, and this eerie thriller heightens
expectations for his next film.
It is a little surprising that a film devoid of the usual
Hollywood trappings of big effects, pyrotechnics, chases and lots of
violence, has done so well at the box office.  But then again, as with
the superb Ghost, its central theme of mortality strikes a personal
and deeply emotional chord with the audience.

Author
David N. Butterworth
        The opening, very deliberate minutes of "The Sixth Sense," Bruce
Willis' latest retread, sets up the oft-seen
marital-celebration-interrupted-by-dangerous-threat situation, in which
child psychologist Malcolm Crowe (Willis) and his wife Anna ("Rushmore"'s
pretty but here pretty ineffective Olivia Williams) are toasting their
success.  Buzzed on red wine, the couple are admiring a plaque presented to
Crowe by the mayor of Philadelphia when suddenly there's a crash in their
bathroom.  The frightened couple investigates to find a scary-looking man
standing there dressed only in a pair of dirty y-fronts, very uninvited and
very upset.
        For a moment I was reminded of a Michael Winner horror film from
the mid-'70s called "The Sentinel" in which Christina Raines' father
appears also uninvited in her bedroom looking just like that, right before
Christina slices off his nose with a kitchen knife.
        In Philadelphia's own M. Night Shyamalan's psychological drama,
Willis confronts the intruder a little less violently, but it soon becomes
clear from the man's rantings that this is a former patient of Crowe's
who's not very satisfied with his treatment.  Crowe thinks he can end this
standoff without bloodshed, but the crazy is having none of it and pulls a
gun and shoots Crowe in the stomach before taking his own life.  Crowe is
left, quite literally, with blood on his hands.
        Referred to by appreciative city officials as one of
"Philadelphia's sons," Crowe is assigned to monitor an eight-year-old boy
who, his crib notes tell him, has divorced parents and suffers from acute
anxiety.  Cole (convincingly portrayed by Haley Joel Osment) has a history
of emotional problems, as well as some physical scarring, and Crowe sets
out to try and help the boy.  Oh, and Cole claims he can see dead people
too.
        Since that film, with its all-star cast, had difficulty in making
its paranormal horror credible, it threw in a number of gross-out scenes to
try and compensate.  And that's exactly what proves to be "The Sixth
Sense"'s undoing.
        My "favorite" scene in the film comes when Cole is once again
hiding in his tent, shining a flashlight under his chin for the best
possible horrific effect, and the camera suddenly pans to the right to
reveal a pale young girl with bloodshot eyes who vomits up her morning
oatmeal.  Why worry about all that thoughtful, serious psychological stuff
when you can cheat your audience with cheap shock scenes like that.
        Toni Collette ("Muriel's Wedding") plays Cole's hardworking South
Philadelphian mother and, alongside Osment, she's the best thing in the
picture.  Collette can't quite manage a "sarf filly" accent, but her
look--from her floozy attire to her garish fingernails--is spot on.  After
many long, uninvolving scenes of Crowe trying to bond with the child
punctuated by all those unwelcome scare tactics, Crowe finally tells Cole
to confront his fears rather than be afraid of them, and Shyamalan wraps
this rather obvious medical advice up with a nicely-loaded metaphor (Cole
plays Arthur in his school's adaptation of "The Sword in the Stone").  That
happens right before the film's spurious "gotcha!" ending.
        Willis is no Olivier, but he's often fun to watch.  Unfortunately,
most of "The Sixth Sense" isn't.  Even with its potentially interesting
supernatural bent, it's still largely schlock footage.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Author
R.L. Strong
HOLLYWOOD PICTURES AND SPYGLASS ENTERTAINMENT PRESENTS
A KENNEDY/MARSHALL/BARRY MENDEL PRODUCTION   BRUCE WILLIS
"THE SIXTH SENSE"  AN M. NIGHT SHYAMALAN FILM   TONI COLLETTE
OLIVIA WILLIAMS  HALEY JOEL OSMENT
MUSIC BY JAMES NEWTON HOWARD  COSTUME DESIGNER  JOANNA JOHNSTON
EDITED BY ANDREW MONDSHEIN   PRODUCTION DESIGNER LARRY FULTON
DIRECTOR OF PHOTOGRAPHY TAK FUJIMOTO  EXECUTIVE PRODUCER SAM MERCER
PRODUCED BY FRANK MARSHALL, KATHLEEN KENNEDY AND BARRY MENDEL
WRITTEN AND DIRECTED BY M. NIGHT SHYAMALAN
"Not every gift is a blessing" So say the ads heeding the release of
Hollywood Pictures surprise sleeper.  Director M. Night Shyamalan has
crafted a marvelously creepy and soulful tale of terror and
redemption.
The film opens with the celebration of psychologist, Dr. Malcolm Crowe
(Bruce Willis) and his wife Anna (Olivia Williams), after having
received a commendation from the Mayor of Philadelphia. Intoxicated
and relaxing, the loving couple is unaware of an intruder in their
house, Vincent Gray, (an unrecognizable Donnie Wahlberg) distraught
over his treatment by Dr. Crowe. Unable to cope with his mania and
claiming to know why 'people are afraid when they're alone', Vincent
shoots Dr.  Crowe and then turns the gun on himself.
Several months later Dr. Crowe is a changed man. Disenchanted over the
failure of his treatment with Vincent Gray and the slow estrangement
of his marriage, Dr. Crowe anxiously needs the redemption that
successfully treating a patient would bring. His chance comes when he
meets 9 year old Cole Sear (Haley Joel Osmant), a boy traumatized by
his ability to see the dead. Slowly, Cole and Dr. Crowe build a
relationship. Slowly Dr. Crowe starts to believe the young boys
stories of otherworldly intervention. His investigation and research
lead him to evidence that these spirits visiting the boy may actually
looking for help. In a remarkably deft and heartfelt (not to mention
surprising) conclusion, Dr. Crowe manages to help the boy realize and
accept his gift while also coming to his own redemptive conclusion.
The script by Mr. Shyamalan is so deep with nuance and
characterization that one grows to appreciate and care about these
people. And when the ghosts start to make the manifestations physical,
the effect is startlingly chilling. The best filmic comparison would
possibly be the interesting "Jacob's Ladder'. What Mr. Shyamalan has
crafted is possibly one of the best, character rich horror films since
Robert Wise's "The Body Snatchers".
The performances are uniformly excellent, with Haley Joel Osmant
performance the standout. What showed as a promising debut as a young
Forrest in the classic "Forrest Gump", Haley Joel Osmant has grown
with each performance (most notably the underrated "Bogus", opposite
Gerald Depardieu). What young Mr. Osmant does in this film is nothing
less than extraordinary. With the subtlety of an Olivier, Mr.  Osmant
brings a truth and earnestness to his performance that is infective.
Within five minutes of screen time, one believes that this boy does in
fact see ghosts. I hereby cast my vote, and urge the Academy of Motion
Pictures and Sciences to set aside a Best Supporting Actor's nod to
this young talent. Mr. Osmant is more than worthy of it.
Bruce Willis, always maligned as an actor (everyone seems to forget
his marvelous performances in 1989's "In Country" and 1994's "Pulp
Fiction'), gives a retrained and poignant performance. His slow
realization of his situation and that of his young patient may be more
than he expects is so on key, that the revelatory denouncement of the
film is both surprisingly shocking and expected. An underrated
performer doing what he does best. Bringing nuance and depth to his
character, in such a way that it takes the audience off guard.
The best surprise in the film is Toni Collette as Lynn Sear, Cole's
single Mother. Unlike other film representations of parents in film,
Ms. Collette brings a degree of warmth to her role that is so
refreshing that it could be held as an example of single
parenting. The depth of her convictions and emotions are so well
realized that we respond to her passionately.  Also, while not being
the traditional Hollywood glamour type of parent, Ms. Collette's
physicality brings with it a comfortable familiarity. From her early
recognition in "Muriel's Wedding", Ms. Collette has proven herself to
be an actress of both depth and conviction. And those two qualities
shine in this film brightly.
To comment on M. Night Shyamalan's direction is to witness a
filmmaker, who is above all else a classic storyteller. Never does the
camera call attention to itself. The cinematography by Tak Fujimoto is
so unobtrusive that the shocks in the film do not seem to be set up,
coming as almost complete surprises.
Mr. Shyamalan's handling of even the quiet scenes is stunning. Most
notably is a sequence wherein Dr.  Crowe listens to the audio
recordings of his sessions with Vincent Gray. The slow, almost
cautious increase of volume, which finally reveals the ghostly voices
of those haunting Vincent, is marvelously cinematic. In his earlier
film 'Wide Awake" also dealt with the idea of death and the afterlife,
but with a lighthearted and sentimental approach. Here, with this film
the essence is on redemption.
Without revealing the ending of the film, one must conclude that not
all of the characters will be able to deal with the changes in their
lives. But the ultimate realization that the acceptance of death can
be more healing than any treatment can.
On a scale of one to five, "The Sixth Sense" rates a supernatural 4. A
marvelously creepy and thought provoking scare fest. One that will
have you talking for days.
Copyright Š 1999 R. L. Strong
Nothing in this article may be quoted or re-printed without the expressed
written permission of the author
****************************
Visit the Dungeon..
The Dungeon Master's Cornucopia of Film
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Makeup/5594/reviews/main.html

Author
James Brundage
Written and Directed by M. Night Shaymalan
Starring Bruce Willis and Haley Joel Osment
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 In my review of Naked Lunch, I attacked the egghead set (a caste in which
some people have placed me) with their stubbornness in saying a film or book
or piece of art is incomprehensible.  Now, it's the Everyman's turn.  If you
didn't see the end of The Sixth Sense coming (which I thought was impossible
until my Uncle John, whom I hold in rather high esteem and who uses words I
do not yet know on a regular basis, did not), then you too fall victim to
the need to praise movies you do not get.  If you saw the end coming, like I
did, you needn't bother.
 Movie connoisseurs will see the ending about ten minutes into the movie.
They will hit a point when it just clicks.  People who are not film buffs
will not pick the ending up, because the knack probably isn't in them to do
so.  Either way, however, you probably won't enjoy this film.  I know the
box office speaks against me with the fact that only this week it has
dropped out of the #1 spot, but the fact is that The Sixth Sense is a poorly
constructed film.
 It spends half of its time trying to be a tear-jerker, the other half
trying to scare you.  Neither scares nor screams ensued from this critic or
his date.  The film goes at about the pace of a slug on a sidewalk.  The
performance by Bruce Willis is reminiscent of his earlier days say, summer
of 1998 in Armageddon.  Newcomer Haley Joel Osment seems around to annoy me
and people like me.
 In the words of Nancy Kerrigan, who's knees were busted up with a hockey
stick, "Why me?"
 The answer lies once again in the faulty school of thought that if
something flies over your head, it must be good.  The Sixth Sense flies not
too high over the mainstream audience's head just high enough that, when
they finally do figure out the ending, they feel like really smart people.
When the ending finally comes if they haven't figured it out, they feel
pretty spiffy in a "horray-for-their-side" sorta way.
 But, all of those people who did enjoy the movie The Sixth Sense, ask
yourselves "why?"  From the dry eyes and generally silent theatre I can say
quite honestly that, although some people were impressed, The Sixth Sense
accomplished none of its tasks.  It didn't make you cry, laugh, scream, or
evict any other emotion.  What The Sixth Sense trafficked in was special
effects of the mental variety.  Tricks of the mind.  It gave the illusion of
being intelligent.  And, because it gave the illusion of being intelligent,
people sang its praises.
 Leave it to a business all about illusions to try to act intelligent, for
that is exactly what The Sixth Sense does (and actually succeeds at).  It
acts as if it were a well thought out and constructed piece when in fact it
was probably one of those screenplays thrown together on the fly in six days
with a how-to-write-your-bestseller book in writer/director M. Night
Shaymalan's hands.
 Hollywood is all about magic, and it is a great piece of magic indeed that
this film pulled itself off.  A lesson to be learned for this nowadays is
that all you have to do to make a movie that will gross $200 Million is act
smart.  But, of course, that's only for the next sixth months of short-term
memory that studio heads have.  After that smart will be passe, and stupid
will once again be en vogue.


Author
Curtis Edmonds
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
To quote Johnny Caspar, it's all about ethics.  If you're an ethical movie
reviewer, you don't give away secrets about movies, you don't spoil the
plot for others, you don't say grandly effusive things about wretched
movies.  (If you're an unethical movie reviewer, of course, you get to see
your name plastered on newspaper advertisements.)  If you can't trust your
friendly neighborhood movie reviewer, who can you trust?  Otherwise, "then
you're back with anarchy, right back in the jungle."
So, no, I won't tell you the secret of The Sixth Sense, even though I would
like to.  I will tell you that I figured it out early on, and that I think
you'll enjoy the movie a lot more if you don't try to figure it out for
yourself. The real question about The Sixth Sense is not about the secret,
not really, but about whether the movie is worth seeing if you know the
secret.  Three of the best secretive movies of recent years -- The Usual
Suspects, Seven, and The Crying Game -- still hold up after repeated
viewings, mostly on the strength of the performances and the script.  On
the other hand, once Michael Douglas's The Game ends, there isn't much
point in going back to the rental counter for another look.  The quality of
the movie is more important than the quality of the secret.
The Sixth Sense is a quality movie because of the quality performances of
Bruce Willis and young Haley Joel Osment.  Willis plays a Philadelphia
child psychologist, dedicated to his work.  The dedication is tested when a
former patient breaks into his house and shoots him before committing
suicide.  A year later, Willis finds young Cole Sear (Osment), exhibiting
some of the same symptoms as his previous patient.
Apart from an early scene where Willis engages in some Dr. Seuss-style
banter (reminiscient of his old David Addison role on Moonlighting) with
Olivia Williams, Willis operates through the movie in Sincere Mode.  The
beautifully counterpointed script has him doing one of two things:  he's
either in session with Cole, or trying to make up with Williams (Rushmore),
who has been depressed and distant ever since the shooting.  Willis in
Sincere Mode is usually a bad sign -- The Jackal springs to mind -- but,
fortunately, Sincere Mode in The Sixth Sense contains a lot of
vulnerability that leads us to some very poignant scenes.
Most of those scenes are with Osment, an 11-year-old actor who's getting
rave reviews for his performance, not to mention the early lead in the Best
Supporting Actor race.  (He's in Sincere Mode too -- in fact, the whole
movie is so sincere it should be expecting a visit from the Great
Pumpkin.)  Osment has to convince us about halfway through the movie that
he "sees dead people" -- a tough job, considering that we haven't seen any
of the dead people he sees, not to speak of, anyway. But, of course, we
believe him, because we've seen him stopped, time and again, by some
nameless fear that we can't see.  Later, we get to see a lot more of these
ghosts and understand what is scaring Osment so badly, but his performance
does an excellent job of conveying the unseen terrors that make the movie
work.
How good is Osment?  I don't want to throw on superlatives here (The Sixth
Sense is kind enough to have a character that's a spoiled brat child actor,
probably as an object lesson) because we all know what happens to child
actors who get too many superlatives too soon.  I would, however, like to
take this opportunity to mention (in case Osment's agent is reading this)
that there's a book out there by Orson Scott Card called Lost Boys that
I've always wanted to see be made into a movie, and that requires a young
child to play a character who may be in touch with the supernatural.  (I
still think that Jake Lloyd is a better fit for Ender's Game, another Card
novel that requires a young protagonist.)
Add to these two great performances a great job of writing and directing
(and acting, in a brief scene) by M. Night Shyamalan, the atmospheric look
of Philadelphia in fall, and good supporting work by Olivia Williams and
Toni Colette, and you've got a very good movie, one that's worth seeing
again, even if you know the secret.
Movie Reviews:  http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
"So how does a conservative movie reviewer, who doesn't want to spoil
the movie, write a review? The same way he takes the lamb chop from
rottweiller -- carefully. Another way is to fill two-thirds of the
column with irrelevant woolgathering about other topics so that you
only have room for a paragraph for the real review."  -- Jonah Goldberg

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     Thematically similar to the current STIR OF ECHOES, THE SIXTH
SENSE is a horror story told so subtly that it is a psychological study
that is told against a backdrop that is almost magical realism.  It is
a mystery told so subtly that the viewer does not even recognize it as
a mystery until at the end the solution is presented.  Then the viewer
may want to see the film a second time just to verify if the script is
consistent and to see how well the mystery was hidden.
     Malcolm Crowe (played by Bruce Willis) is a South Philadelphia
child psychologist.  He is so good at what he does he has been given a
citation from the mayor.  Currently he is dealing with a severely
disturbed child, Vincent Gray (Donnie Wahlberg).  Malcolm knows that
the classic treatment and assumptions of treating children with this
syndrome can be wrong.  The last similar patient grew up highly
disturbed and blaming Malcolm.  In revenge he broke into Malcolm's
house, shooting the psychologist.  Malcolm desperately wants to avoid
the same mistakes in treating Vincent.  But from the beginning he is
having serious trouble connecting with Vincent or in truth with anyone.
His bad experience with the previous patient has left him almost
without the emotions to reach out.  What he slowly begins to discover
is that Vincent is trying to adjust in any way he can to something
beyond an emotional problem. His problem is that he sees the dead.  It
is not just that believes he sees the dead--they really are there and
they talk to him.  He will see a dead child, start to talk to him, and
then see the back of the child's head is blown off. He lives with a
thousand unpleasant jolts like this every day.  The resulting shock is
just more than he can handle much of the time.
     Bruce Willis obviously gets top billing for this film being a
veteran of so many high-grossing films.  In fact he turns in one of his
most subdued and best performances here.  But he is playing opposite an
even better actor.  Donnie Wahlberg has some very difficult scenes to
deliver as the haunted--figuratively and literally--child.  Too young
to have gone through the years of training most of today's actors have,
he seems to be a natural actor capable instinctively of giving a
layered performance.  Whether he is remembered at Academy Award time or
not he has given just about the best performance of the year and he has
made a difficult film work.  Certainly some credit must go to writer
and director M. Night Shyamalan who must have known exactly what
haunted feel he wanted from Wahlberg.  Shyamalan keeps the pacing slow
and ominous throughout.  The James Newton Howard score is not one of
his best but adds to the tension.
     This is a film with some clever twists and a really good
performance by a child actor.  This may be the surprise film of the
season.  I give it an 8 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +2 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Author
Chuck Schwartz
CrankyCriticŽ  The Sixth Sense
Rated [PG-13], 107 minutes
Starring Bruce Willis, Haley Joel Osment
Written and Directed by M. Night Shyamalan
website:http://www.thesixthsense.com
IN SHORT: Creepy and enthralling, with a twist you won't see coming.
Here's the hard part about writing up The Sixth Sense. If I tell you
anything that may clue you in to what is going on in this flick, I will
not be doing what I consider to be my job, 'cuz I'll be giving it away.
So I'm going to tell you a true set of stories to help illustrate some
of the shrink stuff going on in this fine flick.
When a person goes through extreme trauma, as when I broke my neck ten
years back, it is a normal psychological reaction to push away those
people who remind (him) of the trauma. It could be someone who was
present at the time. In my case it was "fix-up dates," all of whom had
suffered some major distraction, shall we say, in their lives. They had
been damaged, as had I and I didn't need to be reminded. It may seem
shallow, but that's life. When my closest friend lost a breast to
cancer, she pushed me out of her life by emasculating me in front of her
friends. I knew what she was doing and when I couldn't stand it anymore
I walked away. We haven't spoken since.
Which brings us to ace child psychiatrist Dr. Malcolm Crowe (Bruce
Willis), who's just been awarded the highest citation that the City of
Philadelphia can give to one of its citizens. His loving wife Anna
(Olivia Williams) doesn't mind playing second fiddle to her hubby's
devotion to his kidlet patients. Then the good doctor's past comes back
to bite him on the ass and extreme trauma kicks in.
A year later, post trauma, the normally quiet doctor has changed. He is
physically and emotionally distant to his wife, misses dates and
anniversaries, spends nearly all his free time with an exceptional case
concerning a potentially psychotic 8-year old boy named Cole Sear (Haley
Joel Osment). Most little kidlets have imaginary friends, but these tend
to fade at Cole's age. His "friends" are terrifying him because they're
not fuzzy li'l Dr. Seuss-type characters. They are the ghosts of people
long dead, all of whom have shuffled off this mortal coil in shocking
and/or violent ways.
Of course, he's probably nuts. He's hides in the local church, and has
scratches and gashes all over his body. His mom (Toni Collette) might be
abusing him, but that doesn't seem likely. His schoolmates all consider
him to be a freak, and as his therapy drags on, this poor kid shrinks
into a world where he is terrified beyond belief. Can the Doctor help
this poor kid? And what of helping his wife? How far should your work
take you from the people you love?
Writer/Director M. Night Shyamalan has done an exceptional job on this,
his third feature. Everything you see is presented in a matter of fact
style, even the icky stuff. There may be a moment where you could feel
as if you've been manipulated in standard horrorflick mode, but there's
no slice 'n' dice. Nothing you see will seem out of place once you
accept the fact that this poor kidlet isn't nuts. And you will. And the
truth will blow you away.
Bruce Willis is doing something unusual for him. He's being a quiet man.
No big action stunts, just quiet speak and doctorly concern. It's a nice
change. The real find is Haley Joel Osment, a kidlet who holds the
screen in a way not seen since Anna Paquin did it in The Piano.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to The Sixth Sense, he would have paid
. . .
After the Blair Witch Project failed to scare me silly y'all wanted to
know what creeps Cranky out. The Sixth Sense did. Don't confuse creepy
with scary, there's a lot more going on here than I'll even hint at.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 1999
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. On the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Author
Jamey Hughton
More MOVIE VIEWS by Jamey Hughton at: http://Welcome.to/MovieViews
The Sixth Sense is a genuine, unexpected treasure in a summer plagued
with severe disappointments (The Haunting, Deep Blue Sea). It manages to
be creepy, unsettling, heart-felt and emotionally satisfying all at the
same time.
Is there a minimum age required for an Oscar nomination? If not, an
early suggestion would be Haley Joel Osment for his amazing performance
in this film. Osment, from Bogus and Forrest Gump, is the most talented
and credible child actor to grace the good screen in years. His tears of
sadness and despair are so frighteningly real it will give you
goosebumps. The mediocrity of a younger actor's performance often
downplays the overall effect of a film like this, but The Sixth Sense is
definitely not the case.
Bruce Willis, in a welcome change of pace, plays child psychologist
Malcolm Crowe. Crowe has been praised for his efforts for helping the
city's children, and awarded with a framed commendation plaque from the
mayor. On the celebration night, he and his wife (Olivia Williams) are
breaking out the champagne when they discover an intruder has entered
their home. It's a former patient (played by Donnie Wahlberg), who is
blaming Crowe that he was of no help to him during the sessions they had
years ago. Despite attempts to calm him down, the frightened man shoots
the good doctor and then turns the gun on himself.
Skip to `Next Fall', where Crowe is now a shadow of his former self. His
new patient is eight-year old Cole Sear (Osment), a social outcast who
is haunted by something he can't explain. His mother (Toni Collette) is
seriously concerned about the strange bruises and cuts forming on Cole's
wrists and back, but she too is totally unaware of the boy's serious
condition. After a few sessions discussing his parents' divorce, the boy
begins to feel more secure with Dr. Crowe. And so Cole works up the
courage to tell him his secret: `I see dead people,' he says. `Walking
around like regular people.'
The Sixth Sense is not a traditional thriller by any means. Director M.
Night Shyamalan (who directed another film with a spiritual angle called
Wide Awake) has crafted a sensational little drama that will chill your
spine and warm your heart both at once. The emotional maturity that
Shyamalan displays in the second half is wonderful and surprising. There
are frightening moments and shocking images, but the overall emotions
displayed here will have you uplifted while leaving the theater
This is Bruce Willis' best performance.... well, ever. The actor
displays incredible power and realism with his character that comes as
an unexpected fulfillment. The scenes between Willis and young Osment
strike the perfect tone. The lines are perfectly delivered, the emotions
are played perfectly, and their relationship is marvelously realized and
never artificial. Actually, it seems as if the adult actors are given
new opportunities to shine whenever around the extraordinary Osment. The
relationship between Cole and his mother is also touching and
well-balanced, and never altered by any kind of emotional fakery. The
directions The Sixth Sense will take you are unexpected and extremely
effective right until the end (and I do mean the very end).
The Sixth Sense is probably the best movie I've seen all year. It's an
amazing, unparalleled and fulfilling experience. The performances are
virtually flawless, the screenplay is consistently well-written, the
dialogue is totally absorbing, and the direction leaves little margin
for error. The final twist of the film is so clever and unexpected that
you will ponder it for weeks afterward. On closer inspection, it may
contain certain flaws, but it remains the most marvelous and surprising
finale I've seen in years. This is a movie that you simply can't miss.
MOVIE VIEWS by Jamey Hughton:  http://Welcome.to/MovieViews
.......................

Author
Gary Jones
The Sixth Sense is an excellent psychological ghost story with a human
heart. Bruce Willis plays Malcolm Crowe, a child psychologist trying to
understand what's going on in the head of Cole, a disturbed schoolboy.
Cole lives with his mother (Toni Collette), and although she senses her
son is very different from other boys, and is aware of the strange
events that occur around him, she does not understand what is wrong and
is frustrated because she cannot help him.
Dr. Crowe befriends his young patient and eventually Cole reveals to him
his secret - that he sees dead people. Crowe is sympathetic and
supportive but does not believe in ghosts. Instead, he thinks Cole is
haunted by spooks constructed from his own imagination, and seeks to
help Cole by getting him to confront the tormented dead of his visions
and find out what they want. We are drawn into Cole's world, seeing what
he sees and sharing his fear at these unwanted visions. 
As Cole, Haley Joel Osment gives a truly memorable performance, and I
don't just mean he's good for a child actor - I mean he's good. "All the
time" - it doesn't sound like much of a line, but the way he delivers it
makes it creepier than anything the Blair witch could throw at us.
M. Night Shyamalan directs his own wonderful script with flair and
sensitivity, and Tak Fujimoto's dark but crisp photography contributes
the sense of menacing reality it brought to The Silence of The Lambs. As
well as being as scary as any ghost movie you're likely to see, the film
is very moving in its examination of Cole's relationships with Dr.
Crowe, with his mother and, indeed, with the dead and the loved ones
they leave behind. Even if you see the twist ending coming, The Sixth
Sense is a cracker of a movie and its success shows that Hollywood can
make thoughtful popular entertainment and make lots of money at the same
time. And that can't be bad.
-- 
Gary Jones 
Homepage: www.bohr.demon.co.uk
PGP public key available from servers (DH/DSS key ID: 0x11EAE903)

Author
Jason Wallis
Under any other circumstances, I would not be discussing the ending of a
film to the extent that I will in this particular review. However, in order
to fully explain exactly how and why this movie is so awful, a minute
dissection of the ending is necessary. Even though I will not reveal the
details of the last scenes, do proceed at your own risk.
The movie opens (quite poorly, I might add) as child psychologist Malcolm
Crowe (Bruce Willis, looking like he was dragged out of his trailer at the
wee hours of the morning to shoot each scene) and his wife are intruded upon
by one of Malcolm's past patients. Distraught, the suicidal man (a cameo by
New Kid on the Block Donnie Wahlberg) shoots Malcolm and then turns the gun
on himself.
Cut to the "next fall", as we find the good doctor quietly observing his
latest case, a trouble young man named Cole (Haley Joel Osment, one of the
only child actors in a while I didn't want to bludgeoned over the head with
a blunt instrument). After about 45 minutes of seemingly unrelated freak
occurrences, we learn that Cole has "the sixth sense", the gift of being
able to communicate with the dead. And this, as they say, is where the
healing begins.
The Sixth Sense and its unexpected popularity is founded upon a twist ending
that I knew going into the film (one of Roger Ebert's colleges was kind
enough to give it away on a recent segment of "Siskel and Ebert"). Although
I was at first enraged that an established film critic could so callously
ruin a film for thousands of patrons, I soon realized that this turn of
events could in fact have been a blessing in disguise; I've always been a
sucker for surprise endings (my favorite movie is The Usual Suspects) and
rarely dislike a film that sports one. Here, since I knew the major plot
twist that was coming at the film's conclusion, the possibly of being
bamboozled into loving a bad movie solely because of its ending (something
I've fallen victim to in the past) was eliminated.
And indeed, my viewing of The Sixth Sense did prove to be quite an
enlightening experiment. Stripped of the element of surprise, the film was
put to the task of showing what it really had, instead of simply hiding
behind a shocking conclusion. After seeing its true colors, I came to the
conclusion that The Sixth Sense is, despite what the many champions of the
movie may say, void of any real power. It's a neat concept, but not one that
justifies being made into a feature-length movie.
In fact, The Sixth Sense relies so strongly on its finale that the rest of
the film develops as a sort of prelude to the supposedly earth-shattering
revelation that is yet to come. And when the final moments do come, it's a
huge letdown; the end makes no sense at all. It stupefied me with the
heights of its ineptitude and is completely idiotic on a fundamental and
very rare level. I won't go into any details, but suffice to say that, as
far as I can tell, it negates to rest of the movie to such an extent that
anyone who buys it even for a second must be suffering from a very acute
case of Attention Deficit Disorder.
Now, in all fairness, I cannot say for sure that I would have guessed the
ending (however stupid it may be) had it not been revealed to me before
hand. However, I feel very confident that I, as well as anyone who had seen
a few "Twilight Zone" episodes, would have seen it coming a mile away. The
fact that movie-goers nation wide are surprised by the ending still has me
stumped.
Ironically, to fully appreciate the best scene (that of Cole and Malcolm
attending a little girl's funeral), the viewer is required to be aware of a
very rare psychological disorder called Munchausen Syndrome by Proxy. I
wouldn't have even known about this mental disease if I hadn't, by pure dumb
luck, caught "Dateline NBC" the other week when they did a feature story on
it.
Despite being blessed with some really amazing cinematography and a brauva
performance from Osment (where was this kid when casting calls were going
out for The Phantom Menace?), in the end, The Sixth Sense is too chalk-full
of contradictions and just isn't plausible enough to warrant even a slight
recommendation.
*Find all of Jason's reviews online at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475
**Complimentary movie ticket courtesy of Valley Cinemas at
http://www.movie-tickets.com

Author
James Sanford
         Although Bruce Willis has starred in some of the biggest hits
of the past 15 years, his best performances are usually found in movies
that turn out to be relatively uncommercial. In blockbusters such as
"Armageddon" or "Die Hard With a Vengeance," Willis seems to be going
through his paces with a minimum of enthusiasm, but he was unforgettably
creepy in director Alan Rudolph's "Mortal Thoughts" and did a superb job
playing a shattered Vietnam vet in "In Country," both of which are
currently languishing on a dusty shelf at a video store near you.
 The fact that Willis is exceptionally good in "The Sixth Sense"
cannot bode well for the film's prospects at the box office. Neither
does the picture's deceptive ad campaign, which seems to promise a
gruesome thriller. Instead, "Sense" is a slow-building drama with some
sharp acting, a few shocks and a devilishly clever final twist.
 In "Sense," Willis is cast as Dr. Malcolm Crowe, a
Philadelphia-based child psychiatrist with "a gift for teaching children
how to be strong," according to his wife Anna (Olivia Williams of
"Rushmore"). His skills are put to the test when he takes on the case of
Cole Sear (Haley Joel Osment), a 9-year-old social outcast suffering
from acute anxiety and symptoms of schizophrenia.
 After some gentle prodding from Crowe, Cole finally reveals the
reasons behind his bizarre behavior: He's an unwilling medium who can
see and hear troubled spirits. The apartment Cole shares with his slowly
unravelling mom Lynn (Toni Collette) is frequently visited by the
spectres of people whose lives ended tragically, such as a little girl
who was poisoned by her mom and an abused wife whose husband drove her
to suicide.
 Unlike the psychic hero of "The Shining" however, Cole is not
being threatened by these visions. In fact, one of the flaws of
writer-director M. Night Shyamalan's screenplay is its inability to
decide exactly what Cole's ethereal friends want or why they've come to
him. Even the author doesn't seem to have an answer.
 What Shyamalan can offer instead is a quietly unsettling
atmosphere, which sets "Sense" apart from most contemporary suspense
films. That the movie works as well as it does is due primarily to
Willis and Osment, an exceptionally expressive young actor who never
resorts to cuteness. Willis effectively underplays Crowe's trepidations
and dwindling self-confidence while Collette, the heroine of "Muriel's
Wedding," is convincingly distraught in what turns out to be a rather
underwritten role.
 "Sense" is also extremely well-produced, using its City of
Brotherly Love setting, an elegiac score by James Newton Howard and
excellent editing to enhance its somber mood. Shyamalan's film proves
sometimes silence can create a much more powerful impact than a steady
bombardment of crashes and booms. James Sanford

Author
Bill Chambers
THE SIXTH SENSE *** (out of four)
-a review by Bill Chambers (6sense@filmfreakcentral.net)
starring Bruce Willis, Haley Joel Osment, Toni Collette, Olivia
Williams
written and directed by M. Night Shyamalan
You've seen this moment before, recently: a particularly troubled
character senses danger of the paranormal kind when the room
temperature inexplicably plummets to below freezing. The difference is
that when it happens to Lili Taylor's Nell in The Haunting, we don't
care. The hero of The Sixth Sense, a young boy named Cole, is a rich
creation, and we wish nothing more than for the ghosts who haunt him
to take a hike.
The seasons have changed since an ex-patient shot jaded child
psychologist Malcolm Crowe (Willis) in the comfort of his own bedroom.
Desperate to get his career back on track, even at the expense of his
crumbling marriage (to Williams, of Rushmore), Malcolm councils the
deeply troubled Cole (Osment). The preteen displays all the quirks of
Malcolm's would-be killer: scars on his body; antisocial behaviour;
and the reluctance to reveal a big secret. Only after Cole is locked
in a closet by some bullies (and hospitalized as a result) does he
divulge to Malcolm, in a spine-tingling scene, that he sees dead
people walking among us, all the time.
Malcolm assumes, and given his profession, reasonably so, that Cole is
schizophrenic, not psychic, but the sincerity in Cole's anguished
confession prevents the doctor from taking drastic measures. He will
instead pursue the supernatural angle, becoming a kind of surrogate
father to Cole (who lives with his single mother, Lynn (Collette)) in
the process.
The Sixth Sense has more in common with Ghost than Poltergeist.
(Though Shyamalan does, somewhat unforgiveably, crib the
self-rearranging kitchen business from the latter.) It's far more
heartwarming than frightening, and the film would be none the worse
for wear without its few pulp shocks. Cole attracts the dead for
reasons unknown, but they're not out to harm him, really-they just
want to be heard, even if it means scaring the bejesus out of the
innocent gradeschooler. Perhaps the apparitions seem more ghastly to
us, at first, than they really are because we're looking at the
situation through the eyes of an eight-year-old.
That's right: Willis, for the first time in years, gives up the
spotlight to his costar. We appreciate Malcolm's domestic dilemma, but
we identify with Cole, recalling our fears of the bogeyman or the
closet monster or the thing under the bed. Both actors deliver
immensely likable performances, and their dynamic is manifest. Willis
convinces us that he's a doctor, something he was unable to do as a
horndog shrink in the overheated Color of Night. Osment is phenomenal,
a true professional who resists mugging for the camera like some child
stars with too much experience in television commercials do.
The Sixth Sense (atmospherically shot by The Silence of the Lambs'
cinematographer, Tak Fujimoto) is actually a drama-its spooky,
effective ad campaign is misleading. Only because I was expecting
something different did I notice-rather, feel-the movie's running
time, which is just shy of two hours. The story unfurls slowly but
engrossingly; its unexpected finish is definitely worth the wait. I'm
not sure said big twist ending is bulletproof, but I admired its
audacity.

Author
Homer Yen
As a part-time reviewer, I can only see one new release a week.  If I'm
lucky, I might see two.  And on this particular week when `The Sixth
Sense' was released, I decided to see `The Thomas Crown Affair' (good
choice) and `Mystery Men' (bad choice).  But three weeks after this
film's release, I see that it is still the #1 film in the country.  It
has already raked in more than $100 million.  And the funny thing is
that I had never even heard any advertisements for this film.  So
obviously, this is a film that is generating huge amounts of business
through word-of-mouth.  Why are throngs of people flocking to see this
film?  I just had to find out for myself.  And, I'm glad that I did.
`The Sixth Sense' begins by introducing us to Malcolm Crowe (Bruce
Willis).  He's a child psychologist that has been bestowed with one of
his field's highest honor for his commitment.  His wife, Lynn (Toni
Collette) quips that it's a commitment that makes his marriage second
priority.  This night is cause for celebration, but an intruder
interrupts his plans.  It's Vincent, a former child patient.  He's
visibly agitated.  He blames Crowe for failing to heal him.  He points
a gun at the stunned Crowe and pulls the trigger and then takes his own
life.
The next fall, we see Crowe healed of his injury, but perhaps still
spiritually wounded.  His next patient is Cole (a wonderful young actor
named Haley Joel Osment).  Cole shows outward signs of isolation,
paranoia, and fear.  In many ways, Cole reminds him of Vincent. 
Healing Cole would also help to heal Crowe's afflicted soul.  Cole is a
very special boy.  We are given hints that he has supernatural powers. 
When his Mom leaves him in the kitchen and returns five seconds later,
she is puzzled to see that all of the drawers and cabinet doors have
been opened.  He has uncanny insight into the history of his school,
which he explains as a place where they hung criminals.  And all of his
photos have a twinkling light that mysteriously appears in the
background.
Crowe is stoical in his approach to Cole.  He asks questions without
being imposing.  However, Cole looks at him with extreme skepticism. 
Up to now, no one has been able to help him.  He's also only about 10,
so he's not very sure about what he wants.  But he does know what he
doesn't want, and that is to not be afraid anymore.  After a tender
rapport is built, he finally confesses that he can see dead people. 
These ghosts walk around like the rest of us, but why they seek out
Cole is as of yet unclear.  With this premise in place, the film takes
on its eerie persona.  Cole is growing more frightful and the audience
sympathizes with him, feeling fear when Cole does.  Time may be running
out for Cole, and he may ultimately become like Vincent if he isn't
healed soon.  However, Crowe's obsession is destroying his marriage. 
Lynn hardly talks to him anymore and she seems to be drifting into an
affair.  
`The Sixth Sense' is like an old-fashioned ghost story.  It is chilling
at times and purposeful throughout.  Young newcomer Osment is the
film's strongest asset.  His mannerisms and delivery are terrific.  He
and Willis connect well and pull off many scenes that require perfectly
timed dialogue.  Willis is very comfortable in his role and gives us a
very likeable character.  But what really did it for me was its ending,
which of course I will not give away.  It added a totally new dimension
to the film and it hits you unexpectedly, but pleasantly, much in the
same way that `The Usual Suspects' concluded.  Perhaps with one of the
strongest endings this year, and as a picture that was much better than
I had expected, this film will reward your time as well as your senses.

Author
Ross Anthony
Excellent. Go see it. "The Sixth Sense" bills itself as a psychological
thriller, but it's really more of a supernatural adventure picture that will
"raise those prickly hairs on the back of your neck."
Bruce Willis plays a child psychologist trying to "heal" a paranoid boy
(Osment). The boy's affliction: he's always scared. And he has good reason
to be.
Though this synopsis is quite brief, more said would mean fewer surprises.
And this is one film sure to surprise you. Rather, let's turn our attention
to the "horror" factor. Make no mistake, this is not a mindless slasher
film. And though it has its moments of gore -- they're usually brief.
Instead, it's the relationship between the psychologist and the boy that
aptly carries the picture -- that and the subjects of the child's "sixth
sense."
Bruce, the boy and his screen mother perform flawlessly. Writer M. Night
Shyamalan has given us characters for whom we care deeply and then wrapped
them up in the most dire of circumstance. But that's not all, he's directed
this picture with meticulous care.
It's a film that will resonate within you.
Starring Bruce Willis, Haley Joel Osment, Tony Collette and Olivia Williams.
Written and Directed by M. Night Shyamalan.
Produced by Frank Marshall, Kathleen Kennedy and Barry Mendel at
Hollywood/Spyglass.
Rated PG-13.
Grade..........................A+
--
Copyright Š 1999 Ross Anthony, currently based in Los Angeles, has scripted
and shot documentaries, music videos, and shorts in 35 countries across
North America, Europe, Africa and Asia. For more reviews visit:
http://RossAnthony.com

Author
Scott Renshaw
THE SIXTH SENSE
(Hollywood)
Starring:  Bruce Willis, Haley Joel Osment, Toni Collette, Olivia
Williams.
Screenplay:  M. Night Shyamalan.
Producers:  Frank Marshall, Kathleen Kennedy and Barry Mendel.
Director:  M. Night Shyamalan.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, brief nudity)
Running Time:  110 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
[Warning: The very nature of this review may involve plot spoilers for
viewers who have not yet seen the film.]
     Of all the benefits I have received from being a film critic, I may
value innocence the most.  It may seem an odd choice of words in a
profession more often associated with cynicism, but it applies
nonetheless.  While the onslaught of studio publicity is impossible to
avoid completely, the ability to attend press screenings serves as
something of a buffer against expectations.  It was impossible for me to
react to the BLAIR WITCH hype since I had written my review six months
before its release; I never needed to guard against becoming aware of key
CRYING GAME-esque plot points.  It was possible for my viewing experience
to remain relative untainted, subject only to pre-conceived notions for
which I could have no one but myself to blame.
     It took the release of THE SIXTH SENSE for me to realize how much
that innocence can matter.  After missing the press screening due to
scheduling conflicts, I became aware that this story -- Malcolm Crowe
(Bruce Willis), a troubled child psychologist, tries to help even more
troubled 9-year-old Cole Sear (Haley Joel Osment) with the child's ability 
to see dead people -- contained a "twist" or "surprise" ending.  Reviews
and discussions meticulously avoided revealing the specific nature of the
ending, but by then the damage had been done.  I considered everything I
knew about the film, and made an educated guess regarding what would be
revealed in its closing moments.  Then I finally caught up with the film,
and watched with my "can I out-guess the writer" glasses on.
     Within twenty minutes, it was obvious that I had guessed correctly.
     I'm not going to suggest that it was particularly clever of me to
figure it out.  I will suggest that I probably wouldn't have been testing
my cleverness if I hadn't known there was something to be figured out.
The simple knowledge that there was a plot point to be sussed out set me
to sussing.  And I spent as much of the film nodding to myself at the
clues I recognized as I did trying to get caught up in the story.
     The nature of the film made such behavior both a blessing and a
curse.  Writer/director M. Night Shyamalan's pacing is so agonizingly
deliberate that I was delighted to have something else on which to train
my attention.  Conversely, I was able to give Bruce Willis's monotonous
performance a bit more benefit of the doubt, and admire the craft which
allowed Shyamalan's little trick to seem plausible.  The only constant to
draw me from my reverie was Osment, a sublimely effective child actor
whose performance alone is enough to recommend THE SIXTH SENSE.  Children
in jeopardy are usually a narrative cheat, but Osment's reactions to his
situation are always more compelling than Shyamalan's few moments of
thriller gimmickry.  The irony is that my connection with Cole's plight
was consistently undercut by my awareness that the film's payoff would
focus on someone else.  
     Perhaps my long-standing aversion to physician-heal-thyself
psychologist/psychiatrist characters (coincidentally sparked by another
Willis film, the ghastly COLOR OF NIGHT) turned me off to Malcolm as an
equal player in the story.  Perhaps the supernaturally comforting closing
shot reminded me too much of GHOST.  Perhaps the big emotional moment for
Toni Collette (as Cole's mother) felt like a cheat because her character
hadn't been developed at all.  Or perhaps I never bought the entire arc of
Malcolm's story from the outset.  It's hard for me to know whether it was
the film itself or my constant view of its wires which left me
unimpressed.  
     The success of THE SIXTH SENSE suggests that it has struck an
emotional chord in many viewers.  For me, the only chords it could strike
were technical.  There was a not-particularly-inspired gag often used by
TITANIC detractors during its theatrical run, something along the lines of
"what's the point, you know the boat's going to sink."  Most of the time,
it's even true.  Next time, I hope I don't go into a film knowing whether
or not the boat is going to sink.

Author
Walter Frith
The creators of my all time favourite television series 'The X-Files' would
have killed for the opportunity to make an episode with the material as
eerie as the stuff contained within 'The Sixth Sense'.  This is right up
their alley and if you love stories about the paranormal, the occult or good
old fashioned ghosts, 'The Sixth Sense' is a film you definitely don't want
to miss.  It strings the audience along and keeps them in the palm of its
hand and deserves to be one of 1999's best films on many critic's lists at
the end of the year.
'The Sixth Sense' is a quiet, sometimes muted, and always surreal thriller
that has psychological overtones that drum up memories of films past.  It
will scare the tar out of you at times and in a very tasteful manner I might
add.  But what makes it truly memorable is that it is not done in a
conventional style with any recognizable formula but offers a plot twist
that will be hard to spot since your mind will be on how the main character
will resolve the fear regarding his sixth sense.
The real test of how good a film can be dramatically is to withdraw any
extreme attempt to overwhelm the audience with a music score.  Few films
succeed at this but 'The Sixth Sense' carries itself extremely well and uses
the afterlife as a metaphor and draws variations (not copies) from films
such as 'Jacob's Ladder' and 'Ghost'.
Bruce Willis is Dr. Malcolm Crowe, a child psychologist who has a very
respectable practice.  So much so in fact that he wins awards from local
dignitaries and has a wife (Olivia Williams) who loves him very much.  One
night at his Philadelphia home, a young adult breaks in and Malcolm
discovers that it's a former patient from a decade or so ago who wasn't
cured of his problems and he shoots Dr. Crowe in the stomach and then
commits suicide.  The film then skips forward to the following autumn and
Malcolm counsels a young boy named Cole Sear (Haley Joel Osment) with a very
serious problem.  Cole confesses: "I see dead people".
This confession doesn't come easily.  It happens about halfway through the
film after some terrifying psychological teasing at the hands of his peers.
He is ridiculed by other children his age and his mother has a difficult
time dealing with her son's problems.
After Cole confesses that he sees the dead, Dr. Crowe diagnosis his case as
paranoia and no one believes he is actually telling the truth.  There are
signs throughout the film that not only can the boy see the dead but he can
actually hear them and communicate with them as well.  'The Sixth Sense'
then takes a strange and sudden twist that will leave you breathless during
the film's final few minutes.
Bruce Willis is good in his role but he falls into the classic trap of
acting with either animals or children who upstage him.  In this case it is
11-year old Haley Joel Osment who gives a heart breaking, strong and eerie
performance as the child with the gift that is more like a curse.  Osment's
performance should bring him an Oscar nomination as Best Supporting Actor.
You may remember him as Tom Hanks' little boy in 'Forrest Gump'.  Strangely,
in a supporting role he manages to be the main character as the film's
entire arc is built around him.
29-year old writer/director M. Night Shyamalan deserves a lot of praise for
crafting a film with intelligence, emotion and one that will give you a lot
of after thought.  The reason it does is that all of the people that the boy
sees have died of violent or unnatural deaths.  There is no mercy in its
look at what the afterlife may be like when the soul leaves the body
unexpectedly and one man's idea of what it may be like is as valid as anyone
else who has tried it in a similarly sophisticated fashion in the past.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Marty Mapes
***1/2 (out of 4) People have said they appreciate a warning when a
movie ought to be seen without any foreknowledge -- when a review might
somehow take away from the experience. I recommend The Sixth Sense
pretty strongly, and it is a movie that's better if you don't know too
much about it. If you think you might see it, don't read any reviews
until afterwards.
THE SIXTH SENSE may look like a horror movie, but it isn't one. The mood
is tense, but never outright frightening. The movie is not so much a
horror movie as a psychological, supernatural thriller.
Cole (Haley Joel Osment, age 11 -- he played Forrest Gump Jr.) is in a
constant state of fear: he is withdrawn, he wakes up screaming, he shows
signs of possibly self-inflicted scratches and scars. He has a secret
that he keeps from his mother (Toni Collette, of "Muriel's Wedding"), so
she is unable to help with, much less understand, Cole's condition.
Their best hope for Cole is Dr. Malcolm Crowe.
Dr. Crowe (Bruce Willis) is Philadelphia's best child psychologist. He
saw a case remarkably like Cole's once before, but in the end, he
couldn't help the patient. This time, however, he is determined to
succeed. 
Dr. Crowe slowly builds trust in Cole, through psychological insight,
through humor, through constant attention. He is finally able to win
Cole's complete trust by baring his own soul: Crowe admits he's afraid
to lose his wife because of his obsession with Cole's case. Cole finally
confides in the doctor and tells his secret: he can see ghosts.
These undead souls are everywhere, in the physically gruesome state of
their deaths. Cole is wakened by them, terrorized by them, and sometimes
even assaulted by them. Dr. Crowe's job suddenly moves way out of his
league, but his promises to Cole and Cole's hard-won trust lock him in
to finishing the job, to doing what he can to help the kid cope.
The film is not perfect, but it is pretty darn good. Shyamalan's
direction is tightly controlled and very well executed. Willis breaks
from his tough-guy image and gives a surprisingly sensitive performance.
Osment is above average for a child actor, and he portrays fear expertly
(although his performance is a little uneven at times.)
But the best thing about the movie is not an individual trait. It is
that all the elements come together to produce the eerie atmosphere that
empathizes with the haunted child. The movie is shot under overcast
skies and cold, fluorescent lights. When night comes and Cole tenses
with fear, the audience tenses with him. The ghosts are rarely glimpsed,
and never for more than a creepy instant. We share Cole's hope that
Crowe can help, and his gray acceptance that he probably can't.
As I said, the film is not perfect. The introduction to Malcolm and his
wife is disgracefully clunky, and the ending is uneven, particularly
compared with the level tension of the rest of the film, but neither
ruined the picture, not by any means.
Look for this movie on my 1999 top ten list.
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.moviehabit.com

Author
Michael Dequina
_The_Sixth_Sense_ (R) ** 1/2 (out of ****)
If a movie is only as good as its ending, then _The_Sixth_Sense_, with
its boffo, perception-altering shock of a conclusion, should be one of
the best thrillers in recent years.  But that closing stroke of genius
cannot add a much-needed layer of interest and urgency to the talky tale
that serves as the twist's slow-going lead-in.
That said, that bulk of _The_Sixth_Sense_ plays better than its
individual parts would lead one to believe.  Bruce Willis stars as
psychologist Malcolm Crowe, and the last time he played someone in the
field of psychoanalysis was in that notoriously unerotic thriller
_Color_of_Night_.  Malcolm is also happens to be a _child_ psychologist,
meaning Willis plays most of his scenes alongside a boy... not unlike
last year's boring flop, _Mercury_Rising_.
The key difference with _The_Sixth_Sense_ is that writer-director M.
Night Shyamalan has given Willis and his cast something to work with. 
While that "something" isn't always effective, it is certainly sturdier
than those other films.  A year after getting shot by a former patient
(who then shot himself), Malcolm takes up the case of Cole Sear (Haley
Joel Osment), a troubled 8-year-old who exhibits some of Malcolm's
deceased patient's symptoms.  But the root of Cole's trouble goes beyond
divorced parents and an unstable home: he has the ability to see ghosts.
While _The_Sixth_Sense_ does feature its share of shock sequences where
Cole is visited by (often bleeding) phantoms, Shyamalan's main interest
isn't necessarily scaring the audience.  He seems more concerned with the
troubled relationships: that between Malcolm and Cole and the more
troubled ones between Cole and his mother (Toni Collette) and Malcolm and
his wife (Olivia Williams, sadly underused).  The performances,
particularly Osment and the versatile Collette's, go a long way in making
the drama believable and sometimes affecting; Willis even comes off well
in an uncharacteristically subdued turn.
The problem lies with Shyamalan's plodding pacing.  The film follows a
predictable rhythm of having a long series of patience-testing
dialogue-heavy scenes followed by a "shock" scene, momentarily jolting
the audience back into alertness before sent back into a haze by the next
series of dialogue scenes.  Shyamalan would have been wise to do some
much-needed tightening to his script, which could have lost a number of
these talky scenes to no ill effect whatsoever.
Shyamalan must be given credit, however, for writing and pulling off
such a terrific surprise ending.  It's a testament to his skill as a
director that the important clues he drops are barely noticeable en route
to the conclusion, which consequently does not feel like a cheap gimmick;
in fact, it nicely ties together the weightier themes the film addresses.
 Alas, as inspired as it is, the twist is too little, too late, and
cannot completely redeem the far less interesting remainder of
_The_Sixth_Sense_.
Michael Dequina
twotrey@juno.com | michael_jordan@geocities.com |
jordan_host@sportsmail.com | mrbrown@iname.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site:  http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline:  http://www.HollywoodHotline.com
on ICQ: #25289934  |  on AOL Instant Messenger: MrBrown23


Author
David Sunga
Starring: Bruce Willis and Haley Joel Osment
Synopsis: 
Hotshot psychiatrist Malcolm Crowe (Bruce Willis) thinks he's on top of the
world until a suicidal patient shows up with a gun. A year later,
thoroughly shaken, with his marriage falling apart and professional skills
waning, Crowe stumbles on the chance to help a frightened 9-year old boy
named Cole (Haley Joel Osment) who is having hallucinations of seeing dead
people. 
Opinion:
Writer/ N. Night Shyamalan knows how to break the rules and get away with
it. Instead of plying us with special effects and a predictable story line,
Shyamalan keeps suspense hanging just in the background, ready to dart out
at any moment, as he focuses on the relationship between Crowe and the kid.
It's wonderful to watch the negotiation between actors Bruce Willis and
Haley Joel Osment. Is the shaken boy taking refuge in the steadfastness of
Crowe, or is the shaken Crowe finding refuge in helping the boy? Then, just
as you think things are beginning to settle . . . boom! The ending is a
doozy, and it makes complete sense, but I won't reveal it. Despite its
title THE SIXTH SENSE has nothing to do with extrasensory perception. But
it's the best ghost story I've seen in years.
Copyright Š 1999 by David Sunga
This review and others like it can be found at 
THE CRITIC ZOO: http://www.criticzoo.com
email: zookeeper@criticzoo.com

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Bruce Willis takes on a role strategically opposite to his usual macho,
wise-crackin', gun-tottin' beefcake, to star alongside a cute kid, in a part
that finds him leveled out as an insightful, caring, children's
psychologist. Could he go an entire picture and not make one wise-ass
remark? You bet!
PLOT:
A children's psychologist becomes strongly attached to one child's problem,
when the boy begins displaying strong signs of similarity with another young
kid whom the doctor once treated, and failed to cure. The boy claims to see
"dead people" walking all around him. In the meanwhile, the doctor's own
marriage begins to fall apart, as he focuses too heavily on the child in
question.
CRITIQUE:
Wow. What an ending. I don't think I've been this moved by a film's
conclusion since the frighteningly shocking end of David Fincher's SEVEN
(9/10). Don't worry because I will obviously not ruin this film for anyone,
but suffice it to say that the end of this film allows you to see the entire
picture from an entirely different point of view, and that is simply a
unique achievement. In fact, I am more than willing to see this film once
again, just so that I could see it unravel within that other realm. Another
thing that stood out for me with this picture was the fact that unlike its
trailer, which sells this film as a chilling thriller, this movie is
actually a supernatural drama with plenty of tear-jerking scenes to boot.
And yes, even your faithful author crumbled under the emotional drainage of
the film's players, filling his eyes with a little bit of the ol' wetness. I
would rather compare it to elements of THE OMEN and GHOST, rather than any
thrill-seekers ride.
In fact, the film is deliberately paced very slowly, with plenty of time
given to the performers to grapple with the potent material at hand. Haley
Joel Osment does an excellent job as the confused young child who is going
through things that no child should ever go through, and even Bruce Willis
pulls off an impressive steady performance, without a single "yipee-kaya" in
the whole script. But once again, allow me re-iterate how much the twist
ending of this film allowed it to catapult onto another level. Even after
the film's credits had long been done rolling, my friends and I could not
help but discuss the various intricacies of the plot which were altered
through this amazing ending, and could not help but further our appreciation
for this film. Great acting, great style, great score, an instant classic
ending, and certainly worthy of being called one of my favorite films of the
year. And despite it not being an all-out thriller, believe me when I say
that you will be startled in a few scenes, and certainly touched in others.
Giant kudos go out to the writer/director of this film, M. Night Shyamalan,
for pulling off a very impressive film presentation.
Oh, and by the way, if this film interests you in the least, make sure that
you see it as soon as possible, before someone ruins the ending for you. It
truly is one to digest firsthand.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Ex-New Kid on the Block, Donnie Wahlberg, makes a powerful performance in
this picture, looking absolutely NOTHING like he used to in the days of
"hanging tough" with his now-defunct band. Such an immense physical
transformation, I have not seen in a long while. Donnie apparently dropped
30 pounds for his minimal role. Robert DeNiro would be proud. Donnie has
eight brothers and sisters, including his one other famous sibling, Mark
Wahlberg, another once-a-singer-now-a-want-to-be-serious-actor in his own
right. Donnie also has a son named Xavier by a member of his brother's band
Marky Mark and the Funky Bunch.
Willis' wife in this movie is played by Olivia Williams, the apple of Max
Fischer's eye in last year's comedy hit, RUSHMORE (8/10).
You may remember child actor Haley Joel Osment from his roles as Avery
Brown, son of TV's "Murphy Brown", Matt Foxworthy son on TV's "The Jeff
Foxworthy Show", and Forrest Junior from, you guessed it, FORREST GUMP.
Actress Toni Collette is Australian. In 1994, she won the Australian
equivalent of the Academy Award for MURIEL'S WEDDING, a role for which she
gained 40 pounds in seven weeks, with the help of a dietician.
Pay close attention, and you will notice writer/director M. Night Shyamalan
in his role in this film as Dr. Hill. Mr. Shyamalan is born in Madras,
India, and wrote/directed his first autobiographical film, PRAYING WITH
ANGER, when he was only 22 years old. This is his third picture.

Author
John Beachem
By now, the vast majority of people will have heard all about "The Sixth
Sense". They will probably have heard about the brilliant ending, the wonderful
performances, and the chilling storyline. This is quite a shame. I'm glad to
have seen it almost immediately after release, so as to avoid much of this
talk. After seeing it, I will say this much, this film is outstanding.
Dr. Malcolm Crowe (Willis) is a gifted child psychologist. The film opens with
he and his wife (Olivia Williams ) celebrating a recent award he received from
the mayor. However, a patient of his from years before named Vincent Gray
(Donnie Wahlberg in a remarkable, if short performance) breaks in, shoots
Crowe, and then himself. Next autumn, we see Crowe physically recovered from
his wounds, but a shadow of the man he once was. His marriage is falling apart
as he and his wife hardly speak and she is slowly drifting into an affair.
Crowe's newest patient is a young boy named Cole Sear (Haley Joel Osmet). Sear
is showing very similar problems to those experienced by Gray back when Crowe
was treating him. Crowe slowly earns the boy's trust, and Sear tells Crowe his
secret. I know almost everyone knows what his secret is, but I'm still not
going to state it here, just in case the reader is one of the few who hasn't
heard.
I often hear Bruce Willis's acting talents criticized, and I will admit that he
tends to play the exact same character over and over in different situations.
He is capable of breaking into other roles however (see In County, 12 Monkeys).
Here, he plays a quiet, caring psychologist who wants nothing more than to help
this boy and get his life back on track. His talents really show through in the
way he is able to take a back seat to the real star of the movie, Haley Joel
Osmet. If Osmet doesn't recieve a nomination from the academy, it will be the
greatest tragedy since "Titanic" beat "LA Confidential" for best picture. 
This is a wonderful movie. Touching, chilling, engrossing, this film is
everything one could want out of a movie. This is not to say it's flawless, but
the few flaws are so tiny they don't detract from the experience at all. As for
the much talked about ending, it's the greatest I've seen since "The Usual
Suspects". It's also not there just for shock value. If one looks back on the
film afterwards, the ending explains many things which didn't entirely make
sense before. 
As I said, the flaws are hardly noticeable, but I feel compelled to point them
out. The music is, at times, rather irritating. Whenever anything surprising
happens, the old, cliche horror movie sound of "dah dah!" is played. At the
start of the film, Anna Crowe wraps her arms around her husband and says
something to the extent of "You're a brilliant child psychologist who has
helped hundreds of people and made great advances in your field". I expected
the frame to freeze on him and have his name appear with a caption explaining
what he did. 
Despite these minute problems, this is an exceptional movie. I reccomend
everyone see it, and give it a well earned five stars.
 * * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
 * * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
 * * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
 * * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
 * - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.
E-mail with comments at JABII@aol.com

Author
Scott J. Promish
At the start of THE SIXTH SENSE, Dr. Malcolm Crowe (Bruce Willis), an
award-winning child psychologist, is confronted in his bedroom by an
intruder who turns out to be a severely disturbed former patient.  The young
man, angry that Crowe was unable to help him, shoots him after some ranting
and then turns the gun on himself.
Cut to `the next fall.'  Crowe's current case is a young boy named Cole
(Haley Joel Osment).  Cole is a lonely outsider, considered a freak at
school.  He seems to have hallucinations, and he later confides to Crowe
that he sees the ghosts of people who don't know they're dead yet.  Crowe
throws himself full into his work, determined to make up for his previous
failure.  In the process, he loses touch with his wife, who has not only
stopped speaking to him, but who is having an affair with a coworker.
THE SIXTH SENSE is being marketed as a horror film but it's barely a
thriller.  There's nothing scary in the film; just a few minor,
clumsily-executed gross-outs (LAWN DOGS' Mischa Barton dripping puke; well I
guess if she suddenly appeared in my bedroom like that I'd be frightened
too.)  Worse, nothing happens to move the story forward.  The characters are
bores and there is no development in themselves or in their relationships
with each other.  The picture is drab and dull, both visually and because of
the flat performances.
Having grown up on The Twilight Zone' and Alfred Hitchcock Presents', I've
always been fond of twist endings, and the one that caps off THE SIXTH SENSE
is good if not completely new.  But it fails to be the revelation it should
have been.  By the time it arrived I was so numb from the rest of the
picture that it had almost no impact.  What's more, it offers no resolution
to the main story of the film.  No one is better or worse off than they were
at the start.  For a film that felt so long to sit through, it's a
frustrating disappointment.

Author
Dennis Schwartz
THE SIXTH SENSE (director/writer: M. Night Shyamalan;
cinematographer:Tak Fujimoto; cast: Bruce Willis (Malcolm Crowe), Haley
Joel Osment (Cole Sear), Toni Collette (Lynn Sear), Olivia Williams
(Anna Crowe), Trevor Morgan (Tommy Tammisimo), Donnie Wahlberg (Vincent
Gray), M. Night Shyamalan (Dr. Hill ), 1999)
It's kitsch all right; but, nevertheless, fine storytelling by the
former NYU film school graduate M. Night Shyamalan (Wide Awake), makes
this moody ghost piece palpable. It offers a superb performance from the
8 year old elementary school aged boy lead, Cole Sear, played by the
eleven year old Haley Joel Osment. This well-crafted  mystery, is a
first-rate summer entertainment vehicle, flaws and all--one large (the
story if examined carefully, especially leading up to its surprise
discovery, would not hold up to careful scrutiny, it's all really
Hollywood hokum), one medium (ghosts can't move physical objects around,
this is pure Hollywood invention), and one minor (ghosts don't leave
marks on one's body, though that was a ploy that added questions about
parental abuse to the story, making it fit into a modern problem in
society). This last point also gave the director a chance to make a
cameo in the film, as the doctor is shown having the mother sent to a
social worker because of the nail scratching marks on the boy's arm.
Dr. Malcolm Crowe (Bruce Willis), a gifted child psychologist in
Philadelphia, who helps Cole get it off his chest, the dark secret that
makes him think he is a freak of nature, different than the other
children, just because he has the ability to see dead people, in other
words, ghosts. Crowe is gentle with him, listens well, has a nice
professional smile, and devotes his whole sense of being to helping the
child out, something that gets the child's trust.
This secret is something he can't even tell his divorced mom, Lynn (Toni
Collette), who works at two jobs to keep things going for them and loves
him dearly, but who, even as she accepts him for what he is still fears
that he is a bit strange. Though, this rare psychic gift, having a sixth
sense, enables him to see things clearly about the dead, as they
regularly visit him, it also frightens him, as he does not understand
what the ghosts want from him, as he tries to resist them and they
sometimes leave bruises on his body. This gift offers him little comfort
in his daily life, as he is friendless in school and burdened with
self-doubts about his sanity, probably quite willing to trade it all in
and be "normal." This, afterall, is quite a burden for the lad to have
on his small shoulders.
Dr. Malcolm Crowe's life is seemingly blissful- doing a job he loves,
making a beneficial contribution to society and to boot, receiving an
award by the city of Philadelphia in recognition for his work in helping
children; he also has a wife, Anna (Olivia), whom he loves dearly, while
she in return also loves him very much and supports his work. But, there
is a problem, and that comes when he is tipsy one evening and there is a
break-in to his upscale house, as his failing effort with a child
patient, Vincent Gray (Donnie Wahlberg), is standing in the bathroom,
now an adult, in his underwear, as the doctor is slowly remembering his
case. The deranged former patient is telling him that he couldn't listen
to him when he treated him, he didn't understand what it meant to be
alone, and abruptly shoots him in the stomach, angrily saying, "You
failed me," and then turns the gun on himself.
Next fall, we see a crestfallen Dr. Crowe, seemingly recovered from the
gunshot, follow Cole into a church and in a concerned way offers to help
him, slowly gaining the child's trust through free association games and
showing a genuine liking for the child, in a non-judgmental sort of way.
This is seen by him, as a chance to help this deeply troubled boy and
also gain professional redemption for his past failure.
Willis is both likable and credible as the vulnerable doctor, who
develops a warm relationship with Haley, both sharing a sadness about
the events in their lives. The mother, Toni Collette, adds to the good
rapport felt throughout the film by the three leads but has a minor role
in getting through to Haley, mainly because she only wants to hear about
good things and Haley's visions are often violent ones.
Haley's fright is convincing because he does not over emote the role but
plays it as a child would who knows that adults don't like to hear
things that are not understood by them. So he speaks in a low, almost
hushed voice of haunting terror, adding punch and gravity to his
hallucinations and ghost stories, making his frightful experience seem
real.
What helps this story out enormously, is that almost everyone you speak
to has some strange tale themselves to tell about their contacts with a
dead person. If you don't believe that, take note of the popular
psychics, such as a James Van Praagh, and see how many calls they get
about relatives communicating with those who are departed. Most psychics
would say that the dead choose to communicate with those who are most
receptive to them, and that they might just be asking for some help from
someone not realizing that they are dead or they are trying to help
someone they care about see something that only they can see. I don't
think this film added much to our knowledge of the paranormal, but it
was an entertaining film, plus it showed how a murder can be solved by
having a sixth sense (something that police sometimes find valuable in
solving a crime). The story was mildly chilling, showing the boy's
visions of the dead people as real, but without the gore that follows
many of this genre's usual commercial horror stories... This escapist
film allows you to take pleasure in this supernatural hokum; perhaps,
even making you feel satisfied by the film's surprise ending, as you
will probably not give this film another passing scary thought:
accepting it for the Hollywood hokum it is, thinking more about the
cleverness of the plot than about whether or not ghosts exists. I didn't
find anything deeper than a good story told here, and for that, the
filmmaker did an admirable job.
Dennis Schwartz: "Ozus' World Movie Reviews"
Š ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Steve Rhodes
Back in the 1930s, the Academy gave out small Oscars for the best
juvenile performance of the year.  (This was before the word juvenile
became a pejorative.)  It is a shame that this practice has fallen by
the wayside, since young Haley Joel Osment (the little boy from BOGUS)
would win this year's award hands down for his incredible work as the
star of THE SIXTH SENSE.
Bruce Willis, who costars with Osment, delivers one of the strongest
performances of his career and still manages to be upstaged by the
talented youngster.  "The most amazing child actor I've ever seen" is
how Willis refers to Osment in the film's press notes.  "I rank this kid
up there with the best adult actors I've worked with over the years."
After seeing the child's brilliant work in this remarkable film,
Willis's observations are easy to agree with.
THE SIXTH SENSE, written and directed with subtly and grace by M. Night
Shyamalan, doesn't fit neatly into any genre, no matter what the
trailers might lead you to believe.  Perhaps the best way to define it
is to say what it isn't.  It's not a horror movie, although there are
some frightening images.  The script is too interior and intellectual to
be considered a traditional thriller, but you will find yourself on the
edge of your seat.  The movie isn't a comedy even though there are
plenty of appreciated opportunities for laughter to break the film's
intensity.  Finally, it isn't a romance, but love is a major theme.
So what is it?  Any category you put it in would be needlessly limiting
and inappropriate.  Suffice it to say that it's a film that will
surprise and mesmerize you.  It's the sort of film that's liable to
elicit a "wow" at the conclusion.
This review will give only the briefest of outline to the story, less
than the trailers provide, so that there is no fear of revealing any of
the fascinating details of the plot.
Award winning child psychologist Dr. Malcolm Crowe (Willis) goes to help
8-year-old Cole Sear (Osment).  A frightened loner, who's called a freak
at school, Cole has a secret that he will not reveal to anyone.  "You're
nice, but you can't help me," Cole tells Malcolm.  This is a boy so
troubled that he steals religious figurines from church in order to
increase the size of the altar in the hidden place in his bedroom.
In his tenderest performance ever, Willis shows his empathy for the
boy's troubles.  Malcolm had a bad incident with a previous patient, and
he views Cole as his chance, perhaps his last chance, to make amends.
The guilt-ridden Malcolm is also having trouble in his marriage.  His
wife, Anna (Olivia Williams from RUSHMORE), doesn't understand him
anymore, and they both suffer from depression.
One day, the very serious boy decides to reveal his secret to the
doctor, something he hasn't been willing to do with his mother.  "I see
dead people," he claims.  "They don't know they're dead.  They only see
what they want to see."  But is there any truth in this?
Tak Fujimoto's dark, intense cinematography reflects the somber tone of
the two protagonists' troubles.  The complex and rewarding script blends
in a strong life-affirming aspect to the melancholy story.  The touching
film moves with great delicacy as it reveals its truths.  The cinematic
equivalent of a page-turner, the movie keeps your eyes glued to the
screen.  The writer respects the intelligence of the audience, saving
the answers to many of the key questions that the story poses for as
long as possible.
As the ending credits roll, you'll be busy discussing the film with
everyone around you.  One subject of the conversation will undoubtedly
be that you want to see it again.  It's that good and that intriguing.
THE SIXTH SENSE runs 1:54.  It is rated PG-13 for intense thematic
material and violent images and would be fine for teenagers.  An R
rating might have been more appropriate.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: http://www.InternetReviews.com

Author
John Carroll
We have been very blessed this summer. It all started with Star Wars Episode 1:
The Phantom Menace. Despite what you thought of the film, it was still a motion
picture experience we will never forget. Then, we saw Austin Powers: The Spy
Who Shagged Me, which turned out to be better then the original. Then, we saw
the end of Stanley Kubrick's great career. And in recent weeks, we have seen
the Indie sensation, The Blair Witch Project and also the sharp comedy,
Bowfinger. And last, but certainly not least, The Sixth Sense. It is very
comparable to The Blair Witch Project in the fact that they both keep you
interested until the end, and then shock you with very haunting and chilling
endings. They are both great films and very worthy of their four star ratings,
but I would have to give a slight edge to The Blair Witch Project, only due to
the fact that Witch's characters are a little stronger and The Sixth Sense goes
slightly too long, but is still great, nonetheless.
The premise is that Bruce Willis is a child psychologist in Philadelphia. The
film starts with Malcolme Crowe (Bruce Willis) winning an award for his work.
Crowe and his wife go to celebrate, but they are interrupted by an old patient
who broke into their home, played by Donnie Wahlberg. He shoots Crowe and the
film moves on to next Fall. Crowe takes a new patient, Cole Sear (Haley Joel
Osment), who displays the same simptoms of Vincent Gray (Wahlberg). Crowe wants
to help Sear, to make up for his failure with Gray.
Bruce Willis is excellent in this film. He is the prototypical Hollywood actor.
He can do action, as shown in the Die Hard trilogy. And he can also do serious
acting, and he displays that trait in The Sixth Sense. He is completely
believable, which is needed in this sort of film. The premise not exactly
something you hear about every day, so each actor had to have a sense of
believability. And Willis does.
However, compared to Haley Joel Osment, Willis is trash. Osment gives a great
performance as Cole Sear. He is able to display such great amounts of emotional
depth despite his young age. He gives a better performance than I have seen
from other veteran actors. I had heard the hype after the release of The Sixth
Sense that Osment deserved an Oscar nomination. I did not believe it...Until
now, that is. He got such a demanding role, and is able to outshine everyone
else in the film with a terrific performance. And his career can only go up
from here. Some of you may remember him as Forrest Gump Jr. from Forrest Gump.
The rest of the cast is solid and basically just feed off the performances of
Osment and Willis. The reason this film is so good is that it does not burden
you with too many subplots. The main plot is, of course, trying to solve the
mystery of what is bothering Cole. The only other subplots are the relationship
between Malcome and his wife, and the relationship between Cole and his mother.
It is simple, straightforward, despite being so complex and interesting.
Overall, The Sixth Sense is this summer's must-see. Just like The Blair Witch
Project it is cheap and interesting. Also like The Blair Witch Project it is
not as scary as you may think, but character interaction and depth make up for
it in both cases. Expect to see Haley Joel Osment and maybe even Bruce Willis
at the Oscars. The only thing holding those two men (and children) from making
acceptance speeches is their summer release. But, their performances are so
strong the voting committee should still be thinking about them come Oscar
Season. And when you start talking Oscars, you know you have just seen a good
film.
Four Stars Out of Four Stars
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Author
Mark O'Hara
Visit Online Film Critics Society at http://www.ofcs.org
Sure, "The Sixth Sense" has its share of clichés, but it is also one of the 
more original and thought-provoking horror dramas to appear in years.  If 
you use movies purely for entertainment, then this one is not for you.
Young writer and director M. Night Shyamalan paces the story well, with a 
romantic opening scene followed by a tense scene upon which the weight of 
the movie eventually rests.  In fact the movie has a habit of calming the 
viewer with a slow scene - though never a boring one - followed by a 
sequence that is fast-paced or even harrowing.
Bruce Willis has chosen his part well this time.  He plays Dr. Malcolm 
Crowe, a Philadelphia-based child psychologist who has just received an 
award from the mayor's office.  Apparently he has put everything in his life 
second to his career, and perhaps he and wife Anna (Olivia Williams) will 
grow closer now.  Enter the harrowing scene.  Upstairs, Anna discovers a 
broken window and articles of clothing shed in a path to the bathroom.  
Malcolm peers inside to see a violently disturbed man wearing only a pair of 
briefs.  Shivering, this stranger confronts Malcolm, crying out "You failed 
me!" and revealing himself as a former patient of Malcolm's.  Played 
convincingly by Donnie Wahlberg, this intruder raises a pistol and shoots 
Malcolm, and then turns the gun on himself.
The next scene opens "The Next Fall," a long shot of a tree-lined street of 
South Philly rowhouses filling the frame.  We see Malcolm spying on a boy 
about nine years old.  This boy, Cole Sear (Haley Joel Osment) is troubled 
with a variety of symptoms.  The first scene between doctor and patient 
happens in an empty Catholic church, Cole lining up his toy figures in one 
of the pews.  The relationship continues with a small degree of reluctance 
on Cole's part:  he does not wish to reveal his "secret," that which lies at 
the heart of his being afraid.
We know from the salvos of trailers that Cole sees "dead people."  He has a 
bizarre knack of knowing the history of the old building in which he attends 
school.  He knows, and reveals in anger, the nickname of his teacher.  What 
seems to be troubling Cole more than the visions themselves is his inability 
to cope with them.  His loving single mom Lynn (Toni Collette) tolerates the 
boy's vagaries, and prays they will get along on her two jobs.  Meanwhile, 
Dr. Malcolm Crowe continues to meet with Cole and, it seems, always visits 
Cole for these meetings; we never see the psychologist's office.
Viewing this movie I found the subplot between Malcolm and Anna Crowe to be 
scant and rather unsatisfying.  There's the scene in which Malcolm arrives 
late at a fancy restaurant, and Anna ignores him, paying for her dinner and 
whispering, "Happy Anniversary, Malcolm" before she leaves him sitting 
there.  Later Malcolm seems oddly detached when a younger man from Anna's 
workplace begins to show interest in her.  To what is this all leading?
Some of the most chilling scenes in memory surface in Cole's hauntings.  He 
is petrified of the ghost that confront him;  they have even physically 
abused him in their anger.  One early teenage boy walks out of Cole's room 
and beckons Cole to follow, saying, "C'mon, I'll show you where my dad keeps 
his guns."  When he turns around we see the bloody pulp of the back of his 
head.  To what is all this leading?
Both plots are headed toward an ending that will shock you and cause you to 
think for hours afterward.
One of the reasons the movie succeeds is Haley Joel Osment.  This 
experienced young actor seems to have his own special method of making his 
character believable.  When he crawls into the makeshift tent in his room - 
his refuge filled with stolen holy statues - the horrid nightmares of 
childhood flood back to us, too.  In fact this boy possesses an amazing 
endurance, hiding the heart of his affliction from his mother, postponing 
telling his doctor until a moment after the doctor tells his own secrets to 
the boy.  An Oscar nomination for Best Supporting Actor would not be out of 
order for Osment.
And perhaps a Best Actor Nomination should come for Willis.  He shows 
admirable restraint here, as in the scene where he comes home to an immense 
empty house, climbs the stairs to the bedroom to find Anna in the shower.  
Turning slightly he spots a bottle of Zoloft anti-depressant in the medicine 
cabinet.  He is surprised, and apparently so numbed that he merely drifts 
out of the room and the house.  In no place does Willis overact or deliver 
an unconvincing response.
Olivia Williams is poignant as Anna Crowe, although the script calls for 
her, necessarily, only a few times.  (Williams is, I might point out, a good 
ten years or so younger than Willis, continuing Hollywood's trend of young 
woman/older man)  As Cole's mother Lynn, Toni Collette gets more screen 
time, and comes off as a realistic, confused parent.  Especially moving is 
her reaction when Cole finally reveals what's up with him.
The film is full of various types of imagery, many of the scenes opening 
with shots of statues and sculptures around Philadelphia.  Add this to the 
somewhat gothic houses and school buildings inhabited by the characters - 
living and dead - and the effect is fascinatingly morbid.  The location 
scouts did their jobs well, and I'm sure Willis felt at home during the 
shooting, only a few miles distant from his native Pennsgrove, across the 
river in South Jersey.  I was also struck by the original use of videos in 
the story, in the recurring wedding tape watched by Anna, as well as the 
tape that acts as a revelation to a grieving father.
Sidney the psychiatrist in the television version of "MASH" said once that 
the real battlefields are the kitchen, the bedroom, the school yard, and 
that's what we see here, characters valiantly facing the wars that uproot 
their lives.  The devastation here is all in the mind, and M. Night 
Shyamalan - who appears in a cameo as Dr. Hill, who suspects Lynn of abusing 
Cole - manipulates both the medium and the genre with expertise.


Author
Serdar Yegulalp
"The Sixth Sense" absolutely blind-sided me.  I don't know what I was
expecting, in retrospect -- maybe something along the lines
of "Poltergeist", with the spirits of the dead tormenting children in a
special effects showdown.  What I got was an absolutely breath-stopping
story that probably ranks as one of the best movies of the whole year.
"The Sixth Sense" could be considered the antithesis of "The
Haunting".  That movie, with its gum-wrapper screenplay and gobs of
CGI, inspired more audiences to laugh and sneer than to be scared or
even thrilled.  "The Sixth Sense" has the most minimal of surfaces
concealing one of the most remarkable of stories, and needs no CGI to
make its magic work.
Bruce Willis, in an atypically restrained and gentle role, plays Malcom
Crowe, a gifted child psychologist.  As the movie opens, he is
confronted by one of his ex-patients, who rants that Crowe has failed
him, and to punctuate this point turns a gun on himself.  One year
later, we find Crowe, humbled and sinking down into himself, estranged
from his wife, and working on a new case: a young boy named Cole (Haley
Joel Osment), who is withdrawn and fearful.
One of the most shameless things that happened during the marketing of
this movie was how several key secrets were revealed during the
promotions.  I don't want to make the same mistakes again, so allow me
to tread very carefully here.  Cole's terror comes from a peculiar gift
he has, one which makes him very much a pariah and an outcast, but for
reasons which become clearer later on.  Crowe isn't sure what to make
of the gift -- is the boy lying to get attention? -- but slowly casts
more and more of his beliefs with the boy.
A description like this does not do this movie justice.  On the
surface, this is a fantastically well-made film: the timing and
presentation of every scene is flawless.  The director and
screenwriter, M. Night Shyamalan, was responsible for the enjoyable but
slight "Wide Awake" last year; nothing in that movie seemed to presage
what "The Sixth Sense" would offer.  Shyamalan has managed to infuse
every scene in this movie with a primal dread that most other films
can't even come close to.
Volumes have been written about Hale Joel Osment, as Cole.  He is half
the reason the film works as well as he does: his hollowed-out eyes,
creaky voice, and disturbing visual tics let him steal every scene he's
in.  What's better is that it's not simply a gimmick performance; it's
all inserted into the movie for a reason.
One of the most astounding things about this movie -- and again, I'm
trying hard not to ruin anything -- is the way it plays on assumed
knowledge.  There is a revelation at the end, which I will not discuss
here, that forces us to COMPLETELY re-evaluate everything we have seen
and take it in a new light.  Even better, it doesn't come off as a
gratuitous gimmick, but as something that needs to happen to allow the
characters their final moment of peace.
"The Sixth Sense" is the kind of rare movie that makes up for a whole
season's worth of mediocrities and disappointments.  See it, and for
God's sake, don't ruin it for your friends.
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by M. Night Shyamalan.
Cast: Haley Joel Osment, Bruce Willis, Toni Collette, Olivia Williams, Donnie 
Wahlberg.
1999 - 113 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and intense situations).
Reviewed August 7, 1999.
And the winner of the second creepiest film of the year (after "The Blair 
Witch Project") goes to director M. Night Shyamalan's "The Sixth Sense." To 
say that the picture is merely "creepy," however, is not giving it nearly as 
much credit as it deserves, as it is that special type of gem that quietly, 
and gradually, sneaks up on you so that you are immediately absorbed into the 
story and characters, but still question throughout where everything could 
possibly be leading. Predict all you want, but it is virtually impossible to 
figure out the ending before it comes, and even though it's right out of left 
field, I hasten to say that it is not used as a gimmick, sort of like 1995's 
"The Usual Suspects." No, the conclusion to "The Sixth Sense" is very 
different, for in one ingeniously simple scene every single plot hole is 
thoroughly patched up, and the film, with that vital turn of the switch, 
gracefully moves right out of being merely a 'psychological thriller,' and 
becomes something far more profound and ruminant that anyone could possibly 
have anticipated when the opening credits began 113 minutes earlier. 
After a stirring prologue in which psychiatrist Dr. Malcolm Crowe (Bruce 
Willis) and his wife, Anna (Olivia Williams), get paid a visit by one of his 
past patients which ends with Malcolm getting shot and the patient committing 
suicide, the film switches to "The Next Fall," as Malcolm has recovered from 
his injury but whose relationship with Anna has turned into a distant one in 
which they don't even speak to each other anymore. Dr. Malcolm's current 
patient is 9-year-old Cole (Haley Joel Osment), a quiet loner of a boy living 
with his hard-working single mother (Toni Collette), who is expected to have 
a behavioral disorder. Cole tells him right away that he seems like a nice 
doctor, but one that can't help him, for this deep, dark, and terrifying 
secret that he is hiding is not known by anyone but himself. So what is the 
secret? Although this revelation is discovered midway through, the trailers 
for the film foolishly give it away, but in respect for those that have been 
fortunate enough not to see them, I will not reveal it. As for those who have 
seen the ads, well, you already know the "secret" and therefore, I don't have 
to give it away for you, either.
The recent releases of "The Blair Witch Project" and "The Sixth Sense" 
couldn't have come at a more opportune time, because both films visually show 
very little of the actual horrific things terrifying the characters, which 
does nothing but add a deep intelligence and eerie effectiveness that 
probably would have been lost in a special-effects extravaganza. Just look at 
Jan De Bont's piss-poor remake of "The Haunting," a $75-million film which 
left nothing to the imagination and, coincidentally, did not have one 
frightening moment in the whole movie. The "less-is-more" theory appears to 
be becoming a tradition recently, and it's a tradition I'd like to see 
continue if these two marvelous films are any indication. Shyamalan is wisely 
very discreet in his storytelling approach to "The Sixth Sense," and the film 
never rushes along to the next scene for the insulting reason of keeping the 
audience awake. If every scene isn't action-packed, that is perfectly fine, 
as the movie progressively draws you into the proceedings as if you were 
reading an intriguing book, so that when a fleeting moment of visual horror 
is seen, it is all the more unexpected and emotionally stirring. 
The highly important role of the child was, no doubt, a tricky part to cast 
because having a sickeningly precocious kid actor who mugs for the camera at 
every opportunity possible would have ruined the whole film. 11-year-old 
Haley Joel Osment (1996's "Bogus") is different, and thankfully so. Simply 
put, Osment is a real actor, one that, with every line of dialogue and 
memorable facial expression, is wholly believable and sympathetic without 
being overly 'cute.' Incredible and unassured, Osment is perfect in relaying 
his character of Cole's personal confusion and terror at the things he is 
able to see. It is the best performance from a child I've seen since 
3-year-old Victoire Thivisol in 1997's "Ponette." 
Because Osment is so very good, the "star" and veteran of the cast, Bruce 
Willis, is unable to hold his own ground as firmly as if a more accomplished 
actor had been playing this same role. Willis has to be given a round of 
applause for choosing this one-of-a-kind film project, which is far better 
than anything else he has been in since 1994's "Pulp Fiction," but there is 
something about Willis' face that keeps him from selling most of his 
characters. Seemingly always smirking as if he is in on the "joke," kind of 
like Adam Sandler, Willis recites some of the dialogue in his "ultra-serious" 
mode, which usually causes him to not fully sell his lines. Still, Willis is 
not, I repeat not, bad in the film, and this somewhat negative reaction 
probably stems more from the brilliance of Osment than from Willis' own 
acting talents.
Right next to Osment on the performance scale is Toni Collette (1995's 
"Muriel's Wedding," 1998's "Clockwatchers"), a prodigious, versatile actress 
who is remarkably poignant and compassionate as Cole's frustrated, caring 
mother. Also of interest is Olivia Williams (1998's "Rushmore"), as Willis' 
long-suffering wife. The role is underwritten and doesn't give her enough to 
do to equal what she is capable of, but intently watch Williams when she is 
on-screen and you will see that the subtle expressions on her face speak 
volumes over spoken words. 
When it all comes down to it, "The Sixth Sense" is a film that shines the 
spotlight brightly on the two main characters, Cole and Dr. Malcolm, and that 
is the rightful centerpiece in which everything else revolves around. 
Amazing, too, how the ending has the sheer power to completely blindside you 
when the final, ultimate twist occurs. This whole review, I know, has been 
fairly vague in description, but that is how it should be. "The Sixth Sense" 
is a genuine experience--genuinely scary, genuinely touching, and genuinely 
thought-provoking--so much so that it is one of those special films released 
in the confines of Hollywood that somehow squeezed through the cracks to 
present an audience with several truly original ideas. Surprisingly, a late 
scene between Cole and his mother may even bring you to tears (it came very 
close for me), the emotions of which come refreshingly from the honesty of 
the situation, rather than from syrupy melodrama. And the real kicker of it 
all is, it turns out "The Sixth Sense" isn't really a typical horror movie at 
all, but actually a contemplative, thoughtful look at the process of life. 
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Author
Brian Matherly
Cast: Bruce Willis, Toni Collette, Olivia Williams, Haley Joel Osment, 
Donnie Wahlberg
Written and Directed by: M. Night Shyamalan
Running Time: 107 minutes
Date Reviewed: August 9, 1999
Bruce Willis stars as Malcolm, an award winning child psychologist who 
discovers one night that one of his former patients is still suffering from 
inner demons.  The now grown man breaks into his apartment while he and his 
wife (Olivia Williams from Rushmore) are celebrating his award, shoots 
Malcolm in the stomach, then takes his own life.  Almost nine months later, 
Malcolm discovers Cole (Haley Joel Osment, in a brilliant performance), 
another young man
afflicted with the same turmoil as his former patient.  He takes on the 
child's case in the hope of redeeming himself for botching up the previous 
one, alienating his wife in the process.  He soon discovers that they boy 
can see and speak to the dead, and his life becomes forever turned upside 
down.
Although the first hour is very slow, The Sixth Sense turns out to be a very 
powerful and moving film.  I was expecting this film to be Mercury Rising 2, 
but was astonished to discover an extremely well plotted out little thriller 
with an outstandingly satisfying ending.  You'll find yourself mentally 
retracing your steps through the film
to see if you actually saw what you think you did once the credits roll.  I 
must give M. Night Shyamalan a lot of credit for a brilliantly written 
screenplay.
The cast should also be given a lot of credit for making the movie as solid 
as it is.  A lesser cast could have made this film a joke.  Bruce Willis 
portrays his character perfectly, balancing his need to help Cole and his 
agony over his strained relationship with his wife skillfully.  Haley Joel 
Osment shines as nine year old Cole, showing patience in his character that 
few young actors these days can pull off.  Toni Collette, looking markedly 
different from her pathetic character in Muriel's Wedding, gives a strong 
performance as Cole's mother, who is trying to cope with both her son's 
"illness" and the passing of her mother.  Finally, Olivia Williams deftly 
portrays a woman having to struggle with a husband who's not around and 
flirtations with a co-worker that could lead to a begrudgingly
accepted end.
It's a shame that they show Cole's abilities in the trailer, because the 
movie takes close to forty minutes to get around to doing the same, so we 
already know what's going on before most of the rest of the cast does.  In 
retrospect though, the forty minute set-up is essential to enjoying the end 
of the film, so I have fewer complaints
now then I did while I was watching the film.  I'm glad that the run of 
teen-styled horror films has passed and filmmakers are starting to make more 
adult fare.  Films like this, the similarly themed Stir of Echoes, and 
countless others to be released later in the year should make for a pretty 
entertaining close to 1999.  [PG-13]
Brian Matherly -- bmath2000@hotmail.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted 
without permission.


Author
Harvey S. Karten
   How strange that Halloween occurs each year during the
fall season when everyone knows that ghosts much prefer
the steamy summer nights for their hauntings.  Kids whose
parents need a rest are sent to camp in July where they sit
around the campfire on Sunday night listening to stories of
goblins and ghosts and monkeys' paws and witches.  If they
don't have their share of such tales, their counselors fill them
in on Tuesdays after the canteens are loaded and blankets
are drawn in the cool mountain air.  Those not fortunate
enough to be in the country or to be eight or nine years old
settle into the seats at the local megaplex, giving what little
imagination they have left in the TV age to the literalness of
the movie screen.  There the fanciful phantoms and spirited
scepters glide across huge Gothic estates or suburban ranch
homes, seen only by those of us still young enough to
possess inventive intuition.  In Jan De Bont's "The Haunting,"
nothing is left to the resourcefulness of our own minds as a
purgatory as literal as a medieval painting passes before our
eyes.  Apparitions of children drift across bedsheets while a
gruesome old man comes to life from a picture to continue
tormenting the wage slaves he drove to their deaths.  In
Myrick and Sanchez's "The Blair Witch Project," the special
f/x guy takes a break as three 20-somethings roam across a
sylvan expanse followed and presumably devoured by
invisible entities that no one ever sees.  M. Night Shyamalan
takes a middle ground in "The Sixth Sense," a story about an
eight-year-old lad with paranormal powers that seems to be
have been made not so much to scare the audience but to
provide a testing ground for Bruce Willis.  Will this actor,
already among the highest paid in history for his profession,
be able to parlay his against-type role as a passive,
shellshocked, reclusive Kentucky uncle in Norman Jewison's
"In Country" into yet a broader range of portrayals?  
   Unfortunately Willis--who enjoys a role as child
psychologist that could have been imbued with resonance
and even transcendence--confuses enervation with kindness
and understanding.  A lame, rambling script and weak
direction from M. Night Shayamalan--whose "Praying with
Anger" deals with a U.S. exchange student who returns to
India as a stranger in his own land--sucks the potential vigor
out of this film, giving it about the same makeup and density
as the sickly looking, watery glass of skim milk that makes its
gruesome appearance twice in the 114-minute tale.
   The one arresting concept in Shayamalan's screenplay is
the role reversal.  Recalling the notion, "physician, heal
thyself," what ultimately materializes from the long sessions
between psychologist Malcolm Crowe (Bruce Willis) and the
little guy who seems to be his sole patient, Cole Sear (Haley
Joel Osment) is a counter-transference.  As disturbed and
fearful as the psychic boy may be, the mature adult analyzing
him is plagued with guilt for ignoring his lovely wife Anna
(Olivia Williams), seemingly driving her into the arms of her
co-worker Sean (Glenn Fitzgerald).  At one point, he has
even forgotten his anniversary date with his wife in a plush
Italian restaurant: when he turns up, she has already finished
her dinner, signed the check, and leaves without speaking or
even looking at the poor man.
   Just as Willis's character, Uncle Emmett, has become a
passive loner in Norman Jewison's "In Country," in "The Sixth
Sense" his life takes a bad turn when he is shot in the
stomach by an intruder, Vincent Gray (Donnie Wahlberg),
whom he recognizes as a patient he was unable to help. 
Though he has soon recovered from his wound, he is scarred
emotionally and determined to relieve his guilt by helping little
Cole.  Cole sees dead people everywhere, people he insists
do not even know that they're deceased.  In one case he
uses his psychic sixth sense to discover that a young girl,
Kyra (Mischa Barton), has been slowly poisoned by her
mother.  In another, he is riding in the family car with his
perpetually distracted mother, Lynn Sear (Toni Collette), and
informs her that a woman two blocks ahead has been killed
in an accident.  While his apparent powers frighten his
mother, who believes the kid simply has a vivid fantasy life,
they do not win him friends at school.  He drives his civics
teacher, Stanley Cunningham (Bruce Norris), off the wall by
reminding him openly that when Cunningham was a kid, he
was called "stuttering Stanley."  Nor can the teacher accept
Cole's knowledge of history when the boy insists that
centuries ago, the building in which the school is now housed
was the scene of a hanging.
   The movie springs to sudden life during its final fifteen
minutes, too late, of course, to redeem the screenplay which
plods along at a torpid pace as if Willis wants to show his
public that he can be more arty than he was in the "Die Hard"
series.  He does not play one of those non-directive
therapists who sit and say nothing for entire sessions, but in
fact conducts a great deal of amiable conversation with his
patient--becoming the only person the kid believes can help
him.  Despite this verbal activity, he appears to sleepwalk
through the role as he tries to reclaim the kid, as though a
low-key operation is coincident with serious acting. 
   Haley Joel Osment, who has been a thesp since the age of
five, is unusually perceptive, pursuing his character with a
serious face and morbid demeanor throughout.  His
relationship with a mother who is so busy with her two jobs
that she absentmindedly tosses her dirty laundry over the
family Husky tugs at the heartstrings.  You feel for the boy
and mother who are trying every so much to connect, if only
little Cole can reveal to her a particular secret that no one
else grasps.  But the movie, devoid of terror, a palpable
sense of torment, and just plain energy, fizzles along,
becoming effervescent too little too late.

Author
Craig Faichney
Starring: Bruce Willis, Haley Joel Osment, Toni Collette, Olivia Williams
It's a curious thing - I've found that when Willis is not
called on to carry the whole movie, he's much better and so is the
movie. Even though, in The Sixth Sense he is the "name", he doesn't
have the pivotal role. That honour goes to Haley Osment who plays Cole
Sear (cute pun, Seer) a 9 year old boy who can see ghosts. If Osment
was cute or precious, the director going for the maudlin, this would
be nothing more than a movie-of-the-week, thankfully, Osment is not
only better than that, but in some instances, blows everyone else off
the screen in a bravura performance. We get to see his fears,
vulnerabilities, strengths and intelligence which makes The Sixth
Sense one of the best movies I've seen this year. The whole cast
matches him in quality, with Willis giving a fairly low key
performance that matches the subject matter.
One thing about this movie, its target. This isn't a sfxfest like
the Haunting or a gorefest, this is more what I'd call a
Supernatural Drama, more interested in characters than in dazzling you
with makeup.
One caveat: there's a lovely twist in the movie, something like the
Usual Suspects, where you end up replaying the movie in your head
rethinking what you have just seen. I was extremely lucky to see it as
a sneak preview in Toronto, before any hype or critical reviews were
out, so I went in with no biases. If anyone want to talk to about the
movie before you see it, DON'T let them. Let the director explain
on his own pace and you'll enjoy the movie vastly more.

Author
Michael Redman
"The universe is not only stranger than you imagine, it's stranger than you
_can_ imagine."
That's been a favorite quote of mine for years, although I don't know who said
it. I would like to think it was Einstein or the Buddha, but in truth it was
probably Spock or Kramer. It doesn't matter where it came from, the reality of
it is apparent. We can't begin to fathom most of the answers. Rarely can we
even ask the questions.
True understanding of the nature of the world is beyond our science. The
occult can only be glimpsed: that's why it's called the occult. Even our own
lives are filled with invisibles that we usually choose to blind ourselves to.
Young eight-year-old Cole Sear (Haley Joel Osmet) can see some of those
unknowns. Everywhere he goes, the restless dead appear. Some even strike up
conversations. Understandably Cole isn't exactly comfortable with the
situation. In fact, he hides in a church and under a make-shift tent in his
bedroom, hoping to avoid the deceased.
Child psychologist Malcolm Crowe (Bruce Willis) is dedicated to helping Cole
cope with what the doctor believes are delusions. Malcolm is also haunted, but
his spectre is the memory of a similar child he was unable to help years ago.
The opening scene of the film is that child, grown to a gaunt spooked adult,
breaking into Malcolm's apartment, blaming him for his misery.
Slowly, the doctor begins to believe Cole's accounts. Maybe the dead really do
want to talk to him. Why?
The film is difficult to talk about for a couple of reasons. The are a few
minutes that completely change the movie and are obviously the most important
scenes in the film. But to discuss them would ruin the flow of the movie for
viewers. Every single person leaving the theater is talking about those
moments. Every one.
I also have very mixed feelings about the movie. There's a heavy oppressive
mood that fits the storyline perfectly, but it rarely lets up. The dramatic
lighting, settings and deliberate slow pacing do exactly what they should, but
halfway through, you're looking for some relief. For some of "Sixth Sense", I
was fighting the urge to view the inside of my eyelids.
But then there are the few minutes that will blow you away.
I was left wondering if those scenes made the rest of the film worthwhile.
Yes, they do. The movie could have been better had more time been spent with
Cole's encounters with his visitors or if there were more breaks from the
melodrama, but it still works.
This is not a scary monster film. The ghosts aren't particularly terrifying.
But there is a point where you must challenge some of your preconceptions
about what is going on. That thought alone is unsettling. What if things
outside the movie different than you believe? What if consensus reality is
wrong? This is the scary stuff.
Osment is a wonder. There aren't many kid actors that could pull off the
horrified, yet resigned to his fate, character. He does it effortlessly. I
happened to catch his appearance on a talk show and was astonished to discover
that he seems to be a normal boy. He's doing real, honest-to-god acting in
this film, not just playing himself like most child actors do.
Willis is always fun to watch, even in the infinite remakes of "Die Hard" with
different names. There are a few films where he steps out of that persona to
become something more real. This is one of those.
Toni Collette as Cole's mother Lynn may be the most believable character in
the movie and offers a down to earth quality to the otherworldliness of the
film. She's a single mom, working too hard, trying to do too much. Lost in her
endless tasks, she feel helpless to deal with her son's retreat from life.
If you are going to see this film, don't let anyone tell you about it. Don't
read any more reviews. Don't ask about those few minutes. There are any number
of things in life that need to be experienced and for which words are
inadequate. This is one of them.
(Michael Redman has written this column for a very long time. You can send any
comments you like to Redman@indepen.com, but he still isn't going to tell you
about those scenes.)
[This appeared in the 8/19/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Author
Kent Johnson
THE SIXTH SENSE
USA, 1999
Written and directed by M. Night Shyamalan
Starring Bruce Willis, Haley Joel Osment, Toni Collette, Olivia Williams
And to think I saw it on Mulberry Street -- er,  at the cineplex!
This is an incredible film, which hit me harder than any film I've seen
this year.  Definitely not something I expected from Hollywood.
THE SIXTH SENSE is a supernatural variation on the story of the
psychiatrist called in to examine a troubled child, who discovers that
the child is hiding some terrible knowledge.  It's not a horror movie,
but rather a suspense film/ghost story on the surface and an emotional
tearjerker about personal redemption underneath.
Horror fans won't be disappointed, however, as the mood and atmosphere
are great and the moments of shock, though few and brief, have
tremendous impact.  Unlike some films which are spoiled by ad campaigns
that give away too much of the plot, knowing what's going to happen in
THE SIXTH SENSE doesn't hurt it at all -- in fact it heightens the
suspense.
The film is beautifully, sensitively and subtly made.  It achieves the
filmic ideal of combining the entertainment value of a Hollywood film
with the vision and quality of an art film.  Contrary to post-Speilberg
filmmaking trends, it assumes its audience is *intelligent* and the
entire film, moment by moment, is a sheer pleasure to experience.  It
does everything right, without a single a false or fumbled step and the
end of the film is a huge cathartic release with a cleansing and healing
after-effect.
The film has great visuals which rather than being a self-conscious end
in themselves are part of the story-telling as a whole and a lot of
information is conveyed visually rather than verbally.  The dialog is
sparse and when used is meaningful and effective.
An example of one of the film's pleasant visual touches (and its belief
in the intelligence of its audience) is the lock of bleached hair that
denotes supernatural powers, visible on two of the characters in the
film.  The camera points it out, but it's never mentioned otherwise.  If
you notice and understand it, it's a little bonus that adds to your
enjoyment of the film, but it doesn't hurt it if you don't.
Another example of visual excellence is when a sunrise is viewed in
time-lapse photography entirely through the reflection of light on a
statue, making the coming of day seem like an unbearably spooky event.
The soundtrack is also very good and is used very effectively as an
integral part of the story-telling.
The acting in the film is uniformly excellent.  Haley Joel Osment, who
plays the boy Cole, is the keystone of the film.  Even with all its
other virtues, the film wouldn't have worked as well as it does without
someone of his ability in this role.  I don't know if a child actor has
ever won an Academy Award, but Osment definitely deserves one.  I was
also intrigued by the fact that Olivia Williams, who plays the
psychiatrist's wife, bears a slight resemblance to Chinese film actress
Joey Wong (Wong Jo Yin).
A wonderfully perfect film.  My Highest Recommendation.
[Because of the strong story, the film will still be good on video, but
I recommend seeing it in the theatre for maximum impact.]

Author
Tim Chandler
Directed by: M. Night Shyamalan
Written by: M. Night Shyamalan
Starring: Bruce Willis, Haley Joel Osment, Toni Collette, Olivia
Williams, Donnie Wahlberg
Produced by: Kathleen Kennedy, Frank Marshall, Barry Mendel
A child psychologist has to help a young boy who sees the dead.
    Imagine you could see the dead; all around you, every day, right
there in front of you. What would you do? Would you go insane, or
would you try to help them. Could you ignore them? Most importantly,
how could you ever convince anyone else that they exist, and would you
even want to? This is the problem plaguing young Cole (Osment) in The
Sixth Sense. He sees the dead, and it is turning him into a bit of a
freak, as his classmates thoughtfully dub him. How could anyone live a
normal life when they see the hanged bodies of people executed decades
ago? Luckily, he gets help in the form of Dr. Malcolm Crowe
(Willis). Dr. Crowe is a noted child psychologist who sees in Cole a
shot at redemption after failing a former patient with similar
problems.
    The Sixth Sense could have been many different types of film. It
could have been a special effects bonanza with walking dead
everywhere; it could have been an action/drama with contrived car
chase sequences etc. Instead, relative newcomer writer/director
M. Night Shyamalan takes a dramatic, psychological approach that works
well. The film places much attention on the mental state of the
characters as the story unfolds. Haley Joel Osment (the young Forrest
Gump) in particular emotes his feelings well, whether terror, anger or
satisfaction. The walking dead do show up occasionally, often shocking
and horrifying the audience; they appear quite dead, but not like the
decomposed zombies of many lesser films.
    Bruce Willis has been trying to shed his image as an action-film
star with such low-budget films as Breakfast of Champions and Nobody's
Fool. He has never been a great actor in my opinion, but his subdued,
quiet approach as Dr. Crowe works nicely. You are able to forget that
he is Bruce Willis for the duration of the film, something people
often can't do. Olivia Williams (Rushmore) is completely wasted as
Malcolm's wife Anna. Toni Collette (Muriel's Wedding) creates a
sympathetic character as Cole's mother, while Cole is convincingly
creeped out and burdened by his 'gift'.
    The storyline flows quite slowly (the film's only weak point) but
is compensated for by a stunning ending. Sixth Sense's ending is my
favourite of the year so far, as stunning as the ends of The Usual
Suspects and The Spanish Prisoner. If only editor Andrew Mondshein had
been a bit more aggressive in his trimming, this could have been a
wonderful film. Unfortunately, despite the film's climax, the
sluggishness of the film makes you check your watch repeatedly.
    Sixth Sense's Cole finds answers to all of the questions asked
above, though they are not always answers he likes. Whether trying to
ignore them, or communicate with them, the dead simply can't leave him
alone. The path that Cole and Dr. Crowe follow is wrought with scares,
sadness (but luckily the occasional bit of levity as well) and in the
end, you will be moved.  Despite its slow pacing, this film is worth
seeing, if only for its climax.
check out more reviews at The Bottom Line
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Heights/8000/index.html

Author
Michael Elliott
DIRECTED BY:      M. Night Shyamalan
STARRING:         Bruce Willis, Haley Joel Osment, Toni Collette, Olivia
Williams, Donnie Wahlberg
WRITTEN BY:       M. Night Shyamalan
RATED:            PG-13 for intense thematic material and violent images.
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       Genesis 2:16-17, 3:4, Ecclesiastes 9:5-6,10, 1
Thessalonians 4:13-18
It has happened again.  A movie that is well scripted, well acted, and
well directed.  It is involving, suspenseful... It even has an unexpected
twist at the end that packs a punch like a blow to the solar plexus.  But
in order to accept its premise one must also accept a spiritual lie.
THE SIXTH SENSE is that movie.  Starring Bruce Willis (ARMAGEDDON) as a
child psychologist and Haley Joel Osment (FORREST GUMP) as a troubled
youngster, THE SIXTH SENSE is more spooky than scary, though it does
contain disturbing images designed to startle.
Eight-year-old Cole Sear (Osment) sees dead people.  Not just in dreams.
And not just as lifeless bodies.  He sees them walking around like regular
people.  And he sees them all the time.
Dr. Malcolm Crowe (Willis) is trying to help him.  He recognizes in Cole
many of the same attributes as one of his earlier patients whom Crowe
failed, resulting in that patient shooting Crowe before turning the gun on
himself.  If Crowe could manage to find a way to help Cole, he believes he
just might be able to put his own demons to rest.
But first he needs to gain Cole's trust.  The boy is so frightened by
what he sees, he has closed himself off emotionally, being unwilling to
tell anyone... not Crowe, not even his own mother (Toni Collette,
CLOCKWATCHERS)... about his "secrets."  Crowe begins to spend more and
more time with him, even as his own marriage starts to dissolve around
him, his wife Anna (Olivia Williams, RUSHMORE) becoming cold and distant
because of his neglect of her and his preoccupation with the boy.
Bruce Willis underplays his role, allowing the excellent script to do
most of the work of building character development.  Crowe moves from
treating a troubled boy who won't communicate, to treating a troubled boy
who is having hallucinations, to wondering if perhaps there isn't some
truth behind what the boy sees.  Mr. Willis does a serviceable job,
letting the focus remain on the story instead of on his familiar action
hero screen persona.
Eleven-year-old Haley Joel Osment manages to impress us with his
performance.  He demonstrates an amazing amount of self-composure as well
as an ability to play nuances in a complex character as if he were a
seasoned pro.  It is fine work for one of such a tender age.  Keep your
eye on this young man.
The supporting cast is also quite effective.  Toni Collette, as the
confused, frightened, and frustrated mother who can't understand what is
happening to her child; Olivia Williams, as Crowe's once loving wife who
is shutting down emotionally due to the lack of attention from her
husband; and Donnie Wahlberg (RANSOM) as Crowe's ex-patient, now grown,
who illustrates his doctor's failure to help him in the most vivid terms
imaginable.
Twenty-eight year old M. Night Shyamalan (WIDE AWAKE) directed his own
script, maintaining a proper tension throughout the film and crafting the
storytelling so expertly that the film's full impact is not reached until
its final moments, when a surprising revelation forces a reevaluation of
all that preceded it.  It is a rare movie which manages to pull that off
and Mr. Shyamalan, as the one responsible, is certainly to be commended.
In giving THE SIXTH SENSE a favorable "three star" review for its
craftsmanship and artistic merit, I must also point out that, spiritually
speaking, the film is highly misleading.  There is no scriptural
foundation upon which to base a belief in ghosts or the "living dead."
The concept of death being a doorway to another plane of existence is a
devilish lie that has been around as long as man himself.  The first lie
recorded in the Bible was devised by the serpent who assured Eve, "Thou
shall not surely die," a direct contradiction of God's admonition.  That
same lie has been perpetuated ad infinitum throughout the ages.
Scriptures do speak of a time when the dead shall rise but that wonderful
demonstration of victory over death will not commence until after the
second coming of Christ... an event which has not yet occurred.
Therefore, the dead remain in a state of oblivion, having no
consciousness, until that long-awaited time when the final trump shall
sound.
And then, you'll need six senses to register all the joy and rejoicing
that will resound throughout the heavens.

Author
Jerry Saravia
Good horror stories are a dime a dozen mainly because writers and directors
have lost the imagination to tell them - gore and dismemberment have stood in
the way of cohesive storytelling elements. "The Blair Witch Project" is a great
horror film whereas "The Sixth Sense" is merely a good one - a sensitively
written, well-directed story of a journey into the world of ghosts. This film
along with Bruce Joel Rubin's "Ghost" play with the idea that ghosts inhabit
the earth for a reason - to complete some unfinished business.
"The Sixth Sense" begins with Dr. Malcolm Crowe (Bruce Willis), a psychologist
who at the start of the film is shot in his home by a deeply disturbed patient
of his. A year later, the seemingly recouped Malcolm finds a morose, quiet boy
named Cole (Haley Joel Osment) suffering from similar problems as Malcolm's
former patient - Cole becomes Crowe's latest study. It turns out that Cole can
see ghosts in his own home, though nobody else can. One is a nervous, evidently
abused woman in a pink robe, the other is a girl who brings Cole some
mysterious box, and so on. Crowe is mystified and intrigued by Cole's visions,
yet he does have problems of his own. Crowe's forlorn wife, Anna (Olivia
Williams), suffers from depression and is ostensibly having an affair, which
angers him enough to throw rocks through storefront windows. They seem unable
to communicate, and she leaves hastily when he is late for a dinner date. He is
consumed by work, she is consumed by sadness. 
"The Sixth Sense" is mostly told through the point-of-view of Cole - we see
these visions through his eyes. No adult can see them, but the good doctor
begins to believe him. The best scenes are when Cole is scared and tense about
some of the ghosts intruding in his home, or when he senses something
unspeakable in a dungeon-like room at a friend's house. There is also a scene
where Cole sees a car accident victim while trying to convince his mother (Toni
Collete) that he "sees dead people." 
There are some effective scenes of controlled tension, and without the
minimalist strength of Willis's performance or Osment's whispered innocence,
"The Sixth Sense" might have fallen apart from lesser hands. It is only when
dealing with Cole's and Crowe's inner lives that writer-director N. Night
Shyamalan ("Wide Awake") fails to lend much weight. 
Olivia Williams, the incandescent co-star of "Rushmore," is given little to do,
and her role lacks development or impact. Somehow, we know she does not listen
or communicate with Crowe, but we learn little about her and her feelings. 
There is also scant development regarding Osment's mother - we get mostly
reaction shots and a big emotional scene but little in the way of knowing how
she relates to her tense son. She almost seems to avoid him, or not pay much
mind when she finds the kitchen's drawers and doors open a second after leaving
them intact while her son is eating. 
"The Sixth Sense" has a haunting sense of menace through its controlled level
of mood and pace (the city of Philadelphia never looked so daunting and
overcast), but it is off-kilter in its emotional context. Its surprise ending
pays off nicely, but there is none of the unifying breadth or tension of the
similar, dream-like "Jacob's Ladder." Still, Willis and Osment keep you
involved and guessing as to what will happen next. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments, or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
The Sixth Sense (1999)
Bruce Willis, Haley Joel Osment, Toni Collette, Olivia Williams, Donnie 
Wahlberg, Glenn Fitzgerald, Mischa Barton, Trevor Morgan, Bruce Norris. 
Music by James Newton Howard. Written and directed by M. Night Shyamalan. 
107 minutes.
Rated PG-13, 3.5 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com
Archive reviews at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
To receive reviews by e-mail at no charge, send subscription requests to 
pbbp24a@prodigy.com
When a whopping five films went into wide release on August 6, industry 
pundits were unsure which ones the public would embrace. "The Iron Giant" 
was the best reviewed film of the year, but, sadly, most adults still 
consider animated movies "kid's stuff" and children rarely get juiced up 
for a flick unless they see its name plastered on a Happy Meal. "The 
Thomas Crown Affair" was glossy, sexy fun, but with the huge success of 
"Runaway Bride," it seemed a little soon for another romance to hit big. 
The political farce "Dick" and the superhero spoof "Mystery Men" both 
appeared too quirky for mainstream audiences and, in the wake of "The 
Blair Witch Project" phenomenon, little attention was paid to "The Sixth 
Sense," the "other" horror film. 
Less than two weeks later, "The Sixth Sense" has become the first release 
since "Star Wars: The Phantom Menace" to hold the number one spot at the 
box office for more than a week, raking in $70 million in just 10 days. 
For a quiet little ghost story starring an actor best known for smirking 
between explosions in action films, this is extraordinary. So what 
exactly is the deal with "The Sixth Sense?"
A few minutes into the press screening of the movie, I jotted the words 
"deliberately paced" in my notebook. Mid-way through, I crossed out 
"deliberate" and replaced it with "dull." But after the striking 
conclusion of the story, I spent a long time in the lobby with a fellow 
critic, enthusiastically discussing the film. The following Saturday, at 
a nationwide sneak preview, we both went to see it again. 
In its own way, "The Sixth Sense" is as innovative as "The Blair Witch 
Project." Writer and director M. Night Shyamalan carefully establishes a 
moody, extremely low-key tone, only to smack you upside the head when you 
least expect it. You feel compelled to watch the movie another time, to 
see how it holds up in light of the things you learned along the way. 
This is one of those rare productions that actually plays better the 
second time around.
It begins when a former patient (Donnie Wahlberg) breaks into the 
Philadelphia home of child psychologist Dr. Malcolm Crowe (Bruce Willis) 
and his wife, Anna (Olivia Williams). The frantic young man accuses the 
doctor of failing him, then abruptly shoots Malcolm, just before turning 
the gun on himself.
Cut to the following autumn. Malcolm and Anna's marriage has taken a 
drastic turn since the tragedy. Both are sullen and non-communicative, 
with Anna focusing most of her attention on her work at an antique shop 
and Malcolm focusing most of his on a new case. Eight-year-old Cole Sear 
(Haley Joel Osment) is an extremely troubled boy. His single mother Lynn 
(Toni Collette) is at a loss to understand the behavior of her son, a 
bright kid who hoards religious figurines, creates alarming drawings and 
constantly surveys his surroundings in fear. The doctor works cautiously 
with the wary child, hoping trying to establish a bond of trust. After 
many meetings, Cole finally turns to Malcolm and reveals his secret. "I 
see dead people," he whispers, desperately looking to the doctor for help.
That's all you need to know. If, like me, you find the proceedings overly 
slow and ponderous, hang in there, because your patience will be rewarded 
with a whale of a payoff. "The Sixth Sense" is one of the better ghost 
stories to come along in quite some time, for those willing to cooperate 
with Shyamalan's methodical presentation. 
The director uses the Philadelphia settings well, creating a stately, 
ominous feel accented by James Newton Howard's creepy, but unobtrusive 
score. Shyamalan ends many scenes by fading to black, a stylistic move 
that seems like a slightly overdone affectation at first, but in fact 
proves essential to the story. His visualizations of the dead are less 
successful. The natural lighting is too matter-of-fact for the ghosts to 
appear authentic; instead of seeming otherworldly, they just look like 
actors in makeup.
His key players compensate for the unconvincing spooks. While 
"Rushmore's" Olivia Williams is given little to do and Toni Collette only 
gets a couple of scenes to display her formidable talents, Bruce Willis 
offers an appropriately restrained performance and Haley Joel Osment is 
exceptional. The young actor does fine work, nimbly projecting 
intelligence, fear and desperation without ever overdoing it.  
Congratulations to those who have made "The Sixth Sense" a box office 
smash. You have shown that mass audiences sometimes do choose a small, 
well-told story over standard, mega-hyped summer dreck. Now, while you're 
making such good decisions, how about giving "The Iron Giant" a chance as 
well?  

Author
Chuck Dowling
Cast: Bruce Willis, Toni Collette, Olivia Williams, Haley Joel Osment,
Donnie Wahlberg 
Written and Directed by: M. Night Shyamalan 
Running Time: 107 minutes 
When I saw The Sixth Sense for the first time during its theatrical run,
I knew ahead of time that there was something amazing coming.  I knew
that there was this fantastic ending that I was told I'd love.  So even
though I was looking for something, when the end twist finally presented
itself it was one of those moments where my jaw actually dropped.  I'm
not saying that as a cliché... my mouth literally fell open in
amazement. 
So now, by watching it again for a second time to review the DVD
release, comes the joy of getting to go back and pick up on all the
little details I missed the first time around (because I wasn't even
looking for them).  As a result, the first hour of the film (which I
originally felt was dull and stretched too thin because we were all
awaiting the inevitable "I see dead people" plot revelation anyway) is
now completely absorbing.  I originally gave the film four stars, but
upon a second viewing, I've bumped it up to five.  The Sixth Sense is
fascinating now, from start to finish.  It's one of the best told
stories I've seen in a long, long time. 
The performances in this film are fantastic.  In particular, young Haley
Joel Osment is the best child actor I think I've seen on film since the
kids from the early scenes of It's A Wonderful Life (scenes that ANY
child actor should be forced to watch by the way).  Forget his Best
Supporting Oscar nod, he's the star of this film... he should have been
up for Best Actor. 
The Sixth Sense:Collector's Edition is available on DVD from Hollywood
Pictures Home Video (a department of Di$ney).  It contains the film in
its original theatrical aspect ratio of 1.85:1 (enhanced for 16x9
televisions) and Dolby Digital 5.1 Surround Sound.  Also included are
several documentary segments covering many aspects of the film's
evolution, deleted scenes, and the usual cast and crew information.  The
original theatrical trailer and two TV spots are also on the disc. 
The making of segments are great, especially considering the fact that
Di$ney never EVER does extras.  Best of all is the "Rules and Clues"
segment where many of the major plot points of the film are presented at
once.  Also, the deleted scenes are all presented with introductions by
writer/director M. Night Shyamalan.  Other discs usually throw deleted
scenes out there and we have no idea where they were supposed to fall in
the grand scheme of the film.  One deleted scene, an extension of the
film's finale, packs quite an emotional wallop and I actually prefer it
to the film's actual ending. 
But just when it seems as though Di$ney does the right thing with their
DVD content, they manage to screw things up even worse.  Apparently
their new policy is to attach a plethora of upcoming Disney trailers at
the beginning of each DVD that you CANNOT SKIP PAST to go directly to
the main menu.  You instead have to watch them or you can fast forward
through them (which means yes, you're still watching them).  Making it
even more absurd is the fact that you are given an option on the menu
screen to watch these trailers AGAIN.  I'm all for extra trailers on a
disc, but I'd like it to be up to me if I decide to watch them or not. 
Hey Di$ney, when will the amount of money you guys have be enough?  When
will it be enough so that you can start acting like the other major
studios? 
Aside from that minor nuisance, The Sixth Sense on DVD is a great
addition to your library.  You get one of the very best movies of the
1990's along with some good extras.  I'll give Di$ney the credit it
deserves here... they're on the right path.  I hope they don't blow it.
[PG-13]
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Author
Eugene Novikov
"I see dead people. Walking around like regular people."
Starring Bruce Willis, Haley Joel Osment, Toni Collette, Olivia
Williams. Rated PG-13.
*Please note: I have found it exceedingly difficult to discuss this
movie without going into plot details. While I have tried to be as vague
as possible, if you plan to see this movie and want to stay completely
clueless about its twists and turns, hold off reading what follows until
you are a Sixth Sense virgin no more.
The ghost story is alive and well in Hollywood, it seems, with at least
three high-profile films that fit the bill being released this year. In
the infamous month of August, a notorious dumping ground for studios who
want wash their hands of films with little potential, Spyglass
Entertainment brings us The Sixth Sense, a somber, deceptively tricky
supernatural thriller that, unlike guilty pleasure films like The Mummy,
is a keeper for all the right reasons.
Bruce Willis is given his first role in a looooong time that requires
him to actually -- gasp! -- act. He plays Malcolm Crowe, a child
psychologist who becomes insecure after his failure with a patient and a
subsequent incident with him. His latest patient is a child named Cole
Sear (Haley Joel Osment), a deeply troubled kid who is convinced he is a
freak because of his peers' ceaseless tauntings. But there is more to
him than meets the eye. Cole claims that he sees dead people who walk
around like regular people. Their invariably gory fatal wounds are still
intact. They want the boy to perform tasks that they themselves cannot.
Malcolm, the M.D. that he is, at first does not believe Cole and The
Sixth Sense risks turning into another "Nobody believes me" story.
Fortunately it makes a hairpin turn off that perilous path as the good
doctor finds proof (dubious as it may be) of the phenomenon. Cole pleads
with Malcolm to "please make them go away." How he is to accomplish that
is a far more difficult matter.
The Sixth Sense is a triumph of calm, confident storytelling rather than
the feverishly kinetic plotting and filming we've come to expect from
Bruce Willis films. This movie is not slow, it's steady and constant.
It's a hypnotically engaging horror mystery; scary, intriguing and
mesmerizing. Here's a movie that is far more frightening yet far less
lauded than The Blair Witch Project, a film that simply isn't nearly as
horrifying as so many claim. The Sixth Sense on the other hand has more
merit as a horror movie than many have given it.
I've despised Bruce Willis for his choice of projects (as opposed to
lack of talent) but here he proves that he can handle a serious role.
His is a nice, quiet, skilled performance, with barely a hint of his
infamous trademark smirk. But, at the risk of repeating other critics,
the real star of The Sixth Sense is little Haley Joel Osment, a
frighteningly talented young actor who is more then up to his
unconventionally challenging role. He not only holds his own in talky,
complex sequences with Willis, but he outshines his older, more
experienced co-star every chance he gets. The movie itself isn't an
award contender but Osment's performance should not -- and I expect that
it will not -- be forgotten come Oscar time.
My biggest problem with The Sixth Sense is the film's ending. It is a
lot of things: shocking, creative, "cool" and a terrific way for
director/screenwriter M. Night Shyamalan to show off his plotting
prowess. What it's not, sadly, is a satisfactory denoument to all that
preceded it. It represents a gear shift rather than a resolution. A more
traditional conclusion may not have been as blindsiding or as showy but
it would have worked better with respect to the storyline. Still, the
ending that we are given will inspire many to go for a second viewing,
or at least to rewind scenes in their had to search for the suddenly
obvious clues to what was destined to happen.
The Sixth Sense is a psychological thriller for the patient, discerning
viewer. It makes no attempt to appeal to those with short attention
spans nor does it aim for the lowest common denominator. It's an
intelligent, complex film (although mostly in retrospect) that flaunts
strong performances, impressive direction and a denoument that will make
your jaw drop, even if it does not resolve as much of the conflict as it
should have. Here is a summer movie that isn't a "summer movie" at all.
Š1999 Eugene Novikov
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Author
Frankie Paiva
An announcement to the world, I have finally seen The Sixth Sense. At first I
didn't want to go, it just didn't sound like that appealing of a movie. Then
one of my friend's told me to go see it, but they like Adam Sandler, so I
dismissed their comment at first. Then my parent's friend went to go see it,
and they loved it. Then my dad's boss said that he and his wife loved it, so
naturally we had to go. And boy was I surprised. Anyone that does not want to
see this movie because it promises to be and scary, and really isn't (there are
only so many Lake Placid's, Deep Blue Sea's, and Blair Witch Project's that you
can see) should suspend all disbelief and go and see this film now. Anyone that
can make up another stupid excuse such as, but I'd rather go to Hooters, or
let's rent a movie instead, should come to their senses (the seventh sense
perhaps?) and see this film immediately.
Malcolm Crowe (Willis, excellent in a non-action film role) is a child
psychologist who is shot by one of his former patients that still believes he
is a freak. A year after he recovers from the shooting, he is assigned his
first new case. Cole Sear (Joel Osment, who I'll be rooting for at the Oscars)
is a disturbed child that is constantly plagued by these horrific visions and
receives multiple stab wounds without ever really getting hurt. Malcom is
frightened as he finds this child to be more and more like the person that shot
him.
So when Cole tells him that he can see dead people (OK, I realize that I am
giving away a major plot point, but all of the ads include those words so I
might as well anyway) he doesn't believe him at first, but as time goes by, be
begins to believe in the supernatural.
Great performances from the entire cast, especially Haley Joel Osment (all you
people that say young people today can't act or win Oscars have been proven
wrong! Heck, if a guy who doesn't speak English can win for being in a truly
magical film, a kid can win for acting in a hella spooky one) and Toni Collette
as his mother. Bruce Willis also belongs on the nomination list, (but will
probably be forgotten with other should be nominees like director Tom Tykwer
and Dan Hedaya in "Dick." If my first paragraph hasn't convinced you to see the
film yet, there are also wild sex scenes that show graphic nudity from all
members of the Dawson's Creek cast, (heck, why not use false statements and
fake advertising to promote a product, it's been done before) and the film is
scarier than Blair Witch (true.) What are you waiting for? Go, now, to the
theater and see The Sixth Sense, which gets *** 1/2 stars.
ADDITIONAL NOTE: If the surprise twist at the end doesn't give you a heart
attack, I think that only the nachos they serve at the refreshment counter
will.
The Young-Uns: The film contains some very chilling scenes of dead people,
vomiting, and poisioning. Good Age: 12-13 & Up
A Review by Frankie Paiva
The 12 Year-Old Movie Reviewer
E-Mail me at SwpStke@aol.com
Visit my website at: http://expage.com/page/teenagemoviecritic
ANOTHER ADDITIONAL NOTE: If you are reading this, you are wasting precious time
to drive to the movie theater to see this movie!

Author
Brian Takeshita
Imagine you are a little kid who could see ghosts.  These ghosts
torment you day and night, some merely frightening you, others causing
real bodily injury.  You need help, and who do you want to come to
your rescue?  Why, Bruce Willis, of course.
Willis plays Malcolm Crowe, a child psychologist who just received a
certificate from the city of Philadelphia for his work.  However, not
everyone shares the city's benevolent view.  One of his former
patients, now grown up, breaks into Crowe's house, berates him for not
being able to save him from his problems so many years ago, and
proceeds to shoot Crowe, then himself.  One year later, Crowe is a
shadow of his former self, with a flagging marriage and a washed-up
career.  However, his next assignment is to help young Cole Sear
(Haley Joel Osment), a boy with problems very similar to his failed
patient.  If Crowe can help little Cole, perhaps he may gain
redemption for his earlier mistake.
M. Night Shyamalan's THE SIXTH SENSE starts out on the wrong foot.
Crowe and his wife (Olivia Williams) have just gotten home from the
awards ceremony and are admiring the certificate's frame.  His wife
hugs him, looks into his eyes, and then spouts some of the most
expository dialog I've heard in a long time.  I'm paraphrasing, but
it's something like, "You're a successful child psychologist who has
pioneered revolutionary techniques in helping children overcome their
hidden problems."   Whoa, why don't we just have a STAR WARS-like
title crawl to fill us in on all the details?  Or how about a freeze
frame of Crowe, with his description subtitled underneath?  It'd be
kind of like what they used to do in those Road Runner cartoons:
Malcolm Crowe (Genius Childus Helperus).  The one saving grace about
this scene is it doesn't last very long, since Crowe's old patient
shows up and soon puts us out of our misery.
After the shooting and a jump ahead to the following year, it would
seem that the film's pace is doggedly slow, taking nearly 40 minutes
to get into gear.  Out of courtesy to the filmmakers, however, I blame
this on the movie's marketing.  Every trailer and commercial shows us
Cole saying, "I see dead people," and pumps us up for some kind of
horror extravaganza, when in reality, it's not until well into the
film that Cole confesses his unique ability.  All the build-up and
precursors would have been effective if we did not know this fact, but
as it is, we're just waiting around for over a half an hour, saying to
ourselves, "All right, where's the dead people?  I wanna see walking
corpses, dammit!"  Okay, maybe I'm overstating it a bit, but you get
the picture.
Luckily, once we start seeing Cole's apparitions, the film picks up a
lot of steam and we're taken along for the ride as Crowe must decide
whether or not this otherworldly manifestation is merely a product of
Cole's imagination, and how he can help the child in any case.  This
is not to say THE SIXTH SENSE turns into an effects-laden tour de
force, however.  Instead, our glimpses of the ghosts are separate and
isolated, satisfying our curiosity and giving us the occasional scare
while not turning the film into just another one of those horror
flicks the industry has been churning out so furiously.  It is simply
evident that writer/director Shyamalan has a good sense of pacing, not
allowing us to be overwhelmed with sensory overload.  Happily for us,
he puts the human story in the forefront, rather than relegating it to
the wings as computer generated images take center stage.
When the scares do come, they are wonderfully effective.  Some of them
catch you totally off guard, while in other cases they are the climax
to painfully suspenseful sequences.  It's nice to know that the art of
frightening is alive and well outside of the slasher movie, and you
don't have to rely on guts, blood, gore, or special effects to still
scare the heck out of an audience.  This film will do quite fine
without them, thank you very much.  Especially in a season where we've
had films like THE HAUNTING, which was 100% effects and constant
scares, and THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT, which was a zero effects
production with a film's length of build-up to a two minute payoff,
it's refreshing to see a film that makes a compromise between the two
extremes and does so with proficiency.
Bruce Willis once again shows us that he's not to be lumped into the
same category of those image-only action heroes.  When called for,
this guy can really act.  He takes it a bit over the top at a couple
of points, but for the most part he does a fine job garnering our
sympathy for his character.  Toni Collette as Cole's mother, Lynn,
also deserves recognition.  Lynn truly loves her son, but must cope
with a problem she does not understand.  Piling on the pressure is the
fact that her husband ran out on her years ago, and she must hold two
jobs in order to pay rent and send Cole to a private school.  Taking
on this role, Collette performs admirably and perhaps only once allows
her Australian accent to slip in.  However, the real surprise in this
film is young Haley Joel Osment.  This kid performs with a level of
experience beyond his years, able to convey the genuine fear he
experiences on a daily basis as well as the suspicious apprehension he
feels toward Crowe.  By movie's end, this young actor has run the
gamut of emotions, all of which are completely convincing.
To be sure, THE SIXTH SENSE has its share of loose ends, but the
overall film is still quite solid.  Along with the suspense and
scares, you also get some really touching moments and even a bit of
humor.  I won't give away a whole lot, but something happens at the
end that will even make you look back on the whole film.  And when a
movie leaves me thinking about it after I've left the theater, that
scores points in my book.

Author
Christopher Null
     Another week in '99, another horror film.  But will THE SIXTH SENSE
really scare you?  Despite the title that is more reminiscent of
LEPRECHAUN than THE EXORCIST, this is a genuinely creepy film with a
solid story, great acting, and a surprise ending that not even a jaded
critic like me saw coming.
     The concept is that young Cole Sear (Osment) sees ghosts, and they
torment him night and day, to the point of physical abuse.  Desperate
for help, he eventually hooks up with brilliant child psychologist
Malcolm Crowe (Willis), who tries to help him out.
     Meanwhile, Cole's mom (Collette) and Malcolm's wife Anna (Williams)
have problems of their own relating to the men in their lives.  While
these subplots are a bit sketchy at first, they do serve a purpose,
coming full circle by the end of the picture.
     Writer/director Shyamalan has a few credits under his belt (nothing
I've ever seen, though), but his skill at combining the supernatural
with the everyday here is pretty well-done, and is largely without
intense special effects.  As for acting, Willis actually does a credible
job with his part, for the first time since 12 MONKEYS (1995).
     Osment -- previously seen as Forrest Gump Jr. in FORREST GUMP, as
the kid in the underrated BOGUS, and as Murphy Brown's son -- is stellar
in his role.  Although he over-enunciates to an extreme, he's an
excellent actor, and I hope that will carry over to his adult roles
later in life.
     THE SIXTH SENSE is still a horror/thriller at its heart, so don't
expect it to win any great flood of awards.  But it's a solid film and
the work of a meticulous writer, which is a rare pleasure these days.
Director: M. Night Shyamalan
Producer: Frank Marshall, Kathleen Kennedy, Barry Mendel
Writer: M. Night Shyamalan
Starring: Bruce Willis, Haley Joel Osment, Toni Collette, Olivia
Williams
http://movies.go.com/sixthsense/index.html
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Author
Scott Miller
Director: M. Night Shyamalan
Producer: Frank Marshall, Kathleen Kennedy, Barry Mendel
Writer: M. Night Shyamalan
Starring: Bruce Willis, Haley Joel Osment, Toni Collette, Olivia
Williams
   Despite what the ads may lead you to believe, The Sixth Sense is not a
horror movie; it's actually a drama--and all the better for it.  Make no
mistake about it, this film does have some scary moments, and the PG-13
rating is well deserved: While there is no sex, only three or four curse
words, and little violent action (two gunshots at the beginning of the
movie), some of the pictures we see of the ghosts could haunt viewers for
days.  So be discerning before you take kids to see this movie.
   The story focuses on two characters: a child psychologist, Malcom Crowe
(Willis), and a nine-year-old boy named Cole (Osment).  As the movie opens,
Malcom has received an award for excellence from the mayor of Philadelphia.
But his private celebration turns bloody when a former client, now a
full-grown but still deeply terrorized man, confronts Malcom, accusing him
of breaking his promise to cure him of his demons.  The man kills himself.
   Several months pass, but nothing can erase Malcom's memory of that
terrifying night.  The haunting memory has changed Malcom, and his wife
doesn't like who he's become; she doesn't talk to him anymore, and she's
started finding pleasure in another man's company.  Malcom feels he only has
himself to blame--for both the shooting and its effects.  He buries himself
in his work, finding another haunted boy who resembles his late client not
only emotionally but physically as well.
   The boy's name is Cole.  Cole is a social outcast with a dark secret.
Despite Malcom's best efforts, he is hard-pressed to convince Cole that he
can help him.  Malcom even has his own doubts about that.  But Cole finally
realizes that not only is this man nice, but he really is the only one who
can solve his problem.
   His problem is that he sees ghosts--not apparitions floating around in
white sheets, but people walking around with gaping mortal wounds that they
don't even realize they have.  ("Come on," says a twelve-year-old boy, "I'll
show you where my dad keeps his gun."  He then turns revealing a hole where
the left side of his head used to be.)  He sees these people everywhere.
Most of them are angry, and they won't leave him alone.
   Cole's mother loves him, but being a single parent, she is unable to
offer little more than moral support.  It's up to Malcom to stop the
hauntings.
   The Sixth Sense doesn't really reach a climax; the story just basically
moves along steadily to the end.  But anyone who might be inclined to
complain about that should be appeased by the last scene.  It was this final
twist that boosted my rating up half a star.
   Most summer movies are special effects bonanzas with five minutes' worth
of story.  The Sixth Sense is high-octane drama with an old-school
philosophy on horror: less is more.  What we do see is graphic, yet somehow
subtle.  If you wasted your money on The Haunting, you can make it back up
here.  And you won't be ashamed to tell people you saw it.
